Hot pink sequined sweater, Moda International (Victoria’s Secret). Black shirt with lace overlay, Moda International. Black pants, Nine and Co. Pink bead necklace, Claire’s Boutique. Crystal earrings, Delia*s. Black pumps, Michelle D.
Rather than focus on real issues and real solutions, our politicians attempt to make “the wealthy” or “welfare recipients” the focus of our debates.
The meek suffer with dirty hands,
The Two Jakes (Vilmos Zsigmond)
“The Coffee Road was maintained by road-hands in the various counties through which it passed, and was in no sense a state road as would be understood nowadays. The only part the state had was in the opening of it before people ever settled in the territory through which it passed. Gen. Coffee, at the expense of the State, employed a crew of men, some thirty or forty, free-labor, and with the help of state surveyors, projected the road through a wild and uninhabited territory. It was just wide enough for two vehicles to pass and was not ditched or graded as is done at present (roads never had ditches until after the Civil War and very few then for many years). “
He began to dress for his return to Shreveport, and I pulled down the covers and snuggled into the bed properly. It was hard to keep my eyes open, though watching him move around my bedroom was a sweet sight.
From start to finish prep time on this food gem takes less time than changing your little one's diaper. That is unless you are unfortunate enough to have a tumbler on your hands like I do. This child of mine, now just shy of sixteen months, hates to have his diaper changed. The only thing that manages to make this required activity bearable is allowing him to play with "something" while I am in the mist of the dirty transaction. This "something" has ranged from a toy of his, my cell phone, a dog toy or whatever is within arms reach. I rarely discriminate on the choice of this "something". I mean how much damage could actually be caused in a few mere seconds of hands on activity with a baby powder container from the nearby diaper bag? Okay, actually a lot of damage. On to the actual recipe...
Had a bad cold, nevertheless
10/5 – St. Christophers – Linthicum, MD
I breathe so heavy and surrender myself, found myself weakest of all,
I used to be the girl with candy in her bag. Always. Skittles, Snickers, Nibs, Nerds, Twix, Jube Jubes, you name it. In fact, if sugar wasn’t within arms reach at all times, I would get a bit panicky. Candy kept me awake during art history lectures and it was my reward for finishing my math homework. It kept me company during the bus ride home from school. And you know that sickatating fluoride rinse you get at the dentist? Well I knew I’d hit rock bottom after a bi-annual check-up, literally counting down the thirty minutes you’re supposed to wait to eat again, to open up my trap for a Pixie Stick.
You still have lots of time to join us. Our current challenge is FESTIVE FLOWERS and if you use Susanna Shopper, you earn TWO entries for the sponsored prize this week!!! We look forward to seeing your creations this week. Enjoy your Monday!!
1Be imitators of God, therefore, as dearly loved children 2and live a life of love, just as Christ loved us and gave himself up for us as a fragrant offering and sacrifice to God.
I could tell you that actually, this is not about the money. That the financial cuts will be detrimental to lives, but that the message the government have sent to the British people, that the weakest, the frailest, the most vulnerable are no longer worthy of collective support will be rejected once that same public understand that message.
With intense funk and progressive interludes, this album is packed to brim with a heavy sound and a deep groove that carries through the whole album. Spacey synths and altered vocals fill out the tracks and keep my attention peaked. Lindstrøm's not making the same music he's made before, he's taking his space-disco into places it's never been and he's doing it with as much finesse as ever. If you can delve into the sugary layers here, you're in for a treat. It's the first great album of the year for me. - Matthew Foster
Clothes - B66,B60
The earlier revenue-sharing agreement was also skewed in favour of multiplexes, with the first-week ratio at 52:48, gradually rising to 70:30 by the fifth week.
Pleased! (to meet you)
Beautifully arranged, nicely written
Having friends on the north-west coast who were going to be interstate themselves at the beginning of our trip made the decision where to go first a little easier. We would land in Devonport and head for the west coast town of Strahan.
The Dread
I will look forward to possibly “seeing” you there.
Katherine Murphy of the Patients Association said: 'Yet again the regulator's assessment of a hospital has proven to be farcically inaccurate. It is nothing but a tick-box exercise that didn't reveal any of these problems.
Warren is now searching for $200,000 to finance the whole operation (Bill, I suggest Kickstarter). He wouldn’t have needed that money had he located the Trinidad, the famous Spanish ship loaded with Aztec gold that sunk in the coast of California in 1540. Warren has repeatedly tried to locate that treasure, once in 1976 and then again in 1987. Back then he claimed he had located the Trinidad, but obviously he didn’t.
GPS tracking is the process through which a functioning cell phone is detected and localized on the globe.
Shame on him, although I’m sure, Rather is immune to any shame.
1-1/2 large eggs (1/2 large egg = 2 Tbsp.)
Rogan had a pizza.
My calendar tells me it is now the month of May. It's always been reliable before, so I have to believe what it says, but I'm a little alarmed by the fact that the month of April is gone. Here in My Florida Backyard, April was a blur of a month, filled with out-of-town guests, broken air conditioning, hectic times at work, and heavy-hitting cough-filled colds that are still dragging on long after it seems they should be. We've pretty much had to leave the gardens to fend for themselves, and for the most part they seemed to do fine without us.
2. Schoolhouse Rock!: (First aired 1973, ran until 1999) Remember how in grade school your teacher would turn certain lessons into a song to help you remember it better? Well that's exactly how the widely popular show Schoolhouse Rock! got its start. The show began after David Mcall noticed that his son was having trouble remembering his multiplication tables but knew the lyrics to several rock songs. Each episode was an animated musical and educational short film that covered topics such as grammar, science, economics, and math. Schoolhouse Rock! was short but sweet and adorned by kids and parents everywhere. It'll definitely go down as one of the classics. Rock on dudes!
Cornbread? oysters? sausage? chestnuts?
Here’s where we are today:
Indianapolis 500 LegendsIndianapolis 500 Legends
The Lyrics to this song by Jennifer rush sum up the love of the angels and their power.
No worries, I thought. I continued to walk into the hallway adjoining the laundry room and kitchen yet the squish sound persisted in following me.
In France, the relationship with immigrants has always been more difficult, and there is no symbol holding out a shining light to welcome new arrivals (ironic therefore that she should be born in this land). I know that I am in a privilieged position to be an immigrant by choice and not financial or political necessity, and to come from a place that is seen positively (albeit with some suspicion!) in the country, but to my French friends, colleagues and family I will always be the Englishman.
One more thing, the cheesy bread recipe makes enough for two crusts. I didn't want two whole pizza thingies. I guessed, and correctly, that the bread would be it's most awesome right out of the oven. So I took the unused half of bread dough and put it in a non airtight container in the fridge. It's important that your container is NOT airtight. You want the dough to be able to breathe a bit in there!
His fingers, yes there was something so beautiful about his fingers.
The higher your score, the more effort and diligence you will need to relieve stress and tension.
Is is not difficult to be provocative and stage an arrest in the US, in a bid to present this as a brutal way to stop the “Holy Spirit”. But I feel that this move by some Charismatic’s in California was not a move by the Holy Spirit, but as fleshy as anything fleshy done in the name of God.
He's been talking about joining the Marines since he was pretty young (ha ha, not THAT young... I just really like this pic of us!). While I'm concerned for his safety because of the state of the world right now, I'm so very proud of him for desiring to serve his country (and for scoring so high on his exams!).
Thanks again for stopping and remember to stop again the following Monday!!!!
Redscorps
Weird thing happened. I practically wound up as Susan’s neighbor! We met at another author’s reading (you’ll get to meet Laura Munson later in the month), and Susan and I got together for coffee last month.
Any Chef worth his salt now wouldn't be seen dead without the latest must have Cheffy fashion accessory: A Foraging Assistant. And perish the thought of admitting that you haven't physically gathered at least some portion of your menu personally,whilst preferably sporting a fetching Burlap tunic fixed with twine and flip flops fashioned lovingly from a couple of 28 day aged reindeer chops, all the while embracing ones inner self,at one with Mother Earth.The food you subsequently create thus elevated to an homage.
My lamp shades were looking a bit dingy and
Fansub: KAA
and spreads outwards
31. I celebrate life.
However, this time my recommendations are based more on the ground under your feet in Greece, rather than the Euro avalanche.
Antonio Genesio Maria Panizzi had been born in Brescello, near Modena, in 1797. Trained as a lawyer, in the period of repression which followed the defeat of Napoleon and the re-imposition of (foreign) monarchical rule on the various Italian kingdoms, duchies and grand duchies, he became involved in the secret revolutionary societies which sought to bring about Italian unity and self-government. It seems likely that (although he always denied it) he was a member of the Carbonari (his close friend and biographer Louis Fagan states unequivocally that he was), or he may have been one of the delightfully named Sublimi Maestri Perfetti. Either way, he was known to the police, and fled the country in 1822 to avoid imminent arrest. Tried and condemned to death in absentia, he was sent a bill by the Inspector of Finances to cover the cost of his prosecution and execution (including the fee for the hangman). From Liverpool, where he was making a living as a teacher of Italian with the support of William Roscoe, historian, botanist, abolitionist and philanthropist, he sent back a cogent argument in favour of non-payment.
The core competencies of AGS is to maintain a strong back office support for each customer engagement, this support includes the provision of expertise on demand, efficient root cause
hot glue and glue gun
Every time I visit Patan - usually to see my Charya dance master Raju Sakya, visit a tantric temple, or to check on some Charya ornaments hand-made by traditional artisans, I try to get in a trip to what I call the "House of Wo."
Lim said the ministers should have read the Bar’s report first as they would have seen it “is based on observations of a monitoring team comprising at least 80 members of the Bar.”
Well, I do not really know. Maybe all of them, maybe none.
I eventually found the official site for the Brazilian consulate and luckily there is a consulate right in Atlanta serving the southeast! Perfect!! Having the consulate in Atlanta would cut down on the processing time and I could hand deliver my documentation and not mail it. Something about mailing my information and passport makes me a little uneasy. So we went through the application and set our appointment in the next few weeks. I got the final itinerary for the trip to Argentina so I can bring that along too. Apparently there is an interview process along with all the paperwork… Hopefully it all goes well! We also have to get passport sized pictures for as part of the application so it’s off to Sams Club!
Bush, now in her mid-thirties but remarkably ageless. We're
This cake was a real delight to make, spread over three days, plus two days to let the flavours set in and mingle before D-day arrived.
Before I leave you, I was able to tele-port myself to the future and I came back with this great picture of me at The Alamo in San Antonio!
Interestingly enough, clicking on those links show the headlines and articles claiming the shooter to be a neo-Nazi have disappeared, being replaced with the news stories that the fellow goes by the name of Mohammed Merah without any correction of their original supposition.
I started out to defend this symbol, but ended up shocked and quite devasted with the evidence gleaned from the academic research. It is the only book on the origin and history of the six-pointed star or hexagram. Have a good read, check the references yourself, and I would be happy to hear your comments. All the best to you.
It's her hugs. Gosh her hugs were the best. Not fake, but real, tight hugs. I want one.
One of the most interesting questions after the interview came from a woman who summed up what many of us seemed to feel when she said Anne Tyler's books had been such a solace to her over the years, and she'd frequently had to stop reading to consider a particular thought that helped her by its truth to deal with life. Had the author herself been consoled by formulating and expressing these truths? To which the answer was no, not rea.
A regiment can be so big it can be seen from all over the battlefield. Some monsters and war machines are the most common examples.
God sees eternity in our daily lives and works out His eternal purpose in our behalf. For example one misses the flight at the airport and questions the Lord in it. The plane crashes; killing all aboard and he then praises the Lord for sparing his life.
#5 The Usual Suspects: Clothes, Jewelry, Shoes and Handbags
More about Peter:
~ Jo :-)
Katherine K Great work ladies! Be sure to grab the Top 3 Sisters badge and proudly display it on your blog. Thanks to all who joined us for our Mother's Day challenge.
Evil Joy out – to charge my phone and track my bill!
Obviously with the flames, smoke, limbs, hoses and legs these guys are incredibly fragile, so I'll have to be careful with them when I play them again, but I'm very satisfied with how they turned out.
Sad, sad, sad....but a little happy too. Beezie started the first grade. I take him to school everyday and my head and heart just can't figure out how this even happened. How my little baby could possibly be in the first grade! I've learned this last year how quickly life can pass us by. So you can make fun of me if you would like, but I'm going to mourn days gone by, try to cherish the day right now, but look forward to the future too. Is that even possible?
Corrupt officials, the Zooma army of lunatics are all kaffirs and so is FW de Klerk and his crew of sell-outs.
You may engage Anthony Cerminaro on a “retainer” basis, for as long as you determine based on your business needs, for a fixed fee, confirmed in advance, for an agreed number of days on your site per month. The scope of services to be provided would be agreed in advance and tailored to meet your needs, but would generally be expected to include the following:
"Taliban leader Mullah Mohammad Omar ... appealed for funding from Muslims around the world—a sign that NATO's campaign may be hurting the militants far more than acknowledged."
The PRC man’s air ticket was reportedly confiscated and he was subsequently arrested. He is currently at Changi General Hospital receiving treatment for his injuries.
Then dora started to mean foreigner – “thella dora” was a white foreigner, “nalla dora” was a black foreigner and dorasani was the foreigner’s woman.
...that it needs to take Viagra just to find its hard drive.
4. Vickie at Frenchy Addict. Although Alli awarded her first, I just have to duplicate it and give it to her again. I love popping by her blog to see what's new in her world, knitting socks, sewing up an apron, having a girl's only glam night, sharing her gardening adventures. It's just a lovely restful moment to drop in to visit here.
Well, I should consider the alternative. I was almost called Augusta Marie. Augusta. I could just imagine my mom stepping out on the front porch to yell for me to come home. “Augusta……Augusta……” And when I was bad, the middle name would be added as we all know. I don’t know how I feel about Augusta. I think it would have been really cool to be called Gus as a girl or even Gussie. My great-great aunt was Augusta Marie and they called her Aggie…That wouldn’t have been so bad. But,I think Aunt Aggie was a lush. So, hey, let’s name your child after her…I guess I’m just not a fan of Vickie Lynn. If I had a choice, I would pick Maggie. It’s my favorite name. I don’t know why.
Maybe I’m missing something. Like some kind of moral thingee that most people have but that I lack somehow. I lack a lot of those. Sad but true.
Here is how it will work.
Color is such a distant memory. I don’t remember the last time I saw true color. Was it after I met Patrick? Abruptly flashbacks of the crash flood in.
You are all so talented and you designed adorable cards!!
All kinds of posts are welcome--whether it's about your family, a craft project,
1tsp Cumin seeds
My mother is a poem
Al Quaeda itself, as Hilary Clinton has recently admitted, was created by the US when anti-communism was the order of the day. But as is often the case with capitalism and imperialism, it cannot see beyond the end of its nose. Having created a Frankenstein, it experienced 9/11.
The story of the Illuminati has been repressed or revealed, debunked or exposed, ridiculed or exaggerated countless times – all depending on the point of the authors and whether they are “apologists” or “critics”. To obtain the absolute truth about a group that was always meant to be secret is quite a challenge and one must use a great deal of judgment and discernment to differentiate the facts from the fabrications. As it is not possible to answer all of the questions relating to the Illuminati, this article simply attempted to draw a more precise picture of the Order and to present important facts relating to it.
Turn dough onto a large floured breadboard or other clean and floured surface like a counter.
Check out her article and the photos she has posted. Hopefully it's not too late to do something about it!
I found this meal plan blog on another blog that I follow here. I have to admit, I was a sceptic. BUT, I checked it out and found that I could try it for *FREE* for one week. So, I signed up and got my first meal plan in my E-mail inbox later that day. Then, she E-mailed me a second. For free!! Seriously!
"I believe (the) council has a role in helping address the issue whether it is through better designed and maintained public areas, examining our place in delivering appropriate services and/or looking for innovative solutions such as a possible increase of night and day patrol services."
I woke up late
those lost years blow in, a moist fragrance,
Learning to stay in control even when angry. Take time-outs. Challenge the myth that ventilating anger is healthy for you.
Today I had my first doctor appt for Wilson baby #3! That is still crazy sounding to me. None of this is very real yet (besides the terrible nausea and overall really CRAPPY feeling this time). I am 8 weeks and 2 days today. Due date is November 19th. Which just happens to be a very popular date in my family as my mom and my sisters birthday! The first ultrasound went just fine, and showed ONE little shrimp with a heartbeat of 145 bpm. If I recall correctly that is about 5-10 bmp slower than the girls...hmm...
“I only have just a minute, only sixty seconds in it;…
In truth this was really a vintage Wednesday but I just got around to taking photos today.
There are SPOILERS in this review!
Some people try and blame the bud.
The New Jersey Appellate Division sides with Essex Chemical Corporation, a subsidiary of DOW Chemical, in a suit filed by the NJDEP in its effort to obtain both restoration and compensatory natural resource damages (“NRDs”) pursuant to the Spill Compensation and Control Act (“Spill Act”). The Court held that Essex Chemical did not need to pay $8 million sought by the NJDEP under the Spill Act.
Tonight we took a few minutes to see where the kids "stand." Our lovely 3 year old now stands at 37.25" and is a whopping 31.8 pounds. She keeps telling everyone she eats so she can get taller, and it appears that she's grown roughly 4 inches over the last year. I called today and made her three year check up so we'll get her "official" stats on January 17th.
As I mentioned last time, I started a Duty & Honour campaign for one of my game groups and we're having a good time. I had originally planned on a different genre game all together but, like the poem says, "the best laid plans" and all that.
I have added the Picassa App to the iPad too.....so all my photos are right there when I want to use PhotoForge.
The next day, Rich Mom gets her shares in the company transferred to Se Na. While she’s chilling in her hotel room, Tae Mu tells her that he’s found her daughter. She’s excited and he leads her to the dinning room, only for her to see her daughter waiting for her. But alas, she’s looking for In Joo and not Se Na so she knows something is up.
I guess I should say a big THANK YOU to the Groveport Elementary School PTO for putting together the free Family Movie Night. It was a great way to spend the evening with the kids.
The comparison is so weak, hair pulling to drug addiction, but I decided to try one more time. Could I really stop pulling out my hair (and with a new situation that made me want to pull even more!). I told my barber to cut my hair short, almost to a fade. After, when I ran my hand over my head, I couldn't distinguish the low spot. And then I decided that for me, I just couldn't touch my hair anymore. I could wash it, and I could comb it in the morning, but there'd be no more massaging the texture, or giving myself five minutes, or letting my hands feel my favorite spot during a phone call. No more pulling out my greys. I had to stop cold.
Scrappy Scrappy Little Star - I think it has a very sweet look to it, and next time I have to make a baby quilt I think I'll do a smaller version of this.
For those who will and do attend the Churches across America during the Holiday Season, remember children do not find the same sense of peace that we do in Church services. It takes all of us years to develope faith. To deny a child, their moment of joy, either with making them the center of attention, or gifting them with a warm coat, or new shoes, a full stomach, or yes even a toy, does us well to remember that Christmas is also about the type of grownup or human being we also are. To pay honor strictly to the spirituality and our needs and then to deny our children joy, speaks mountains of the kind of person we are not. Do not let your pride come before the generosity, being offered out of love to you and your children, by those Santa Claus amongst us, who wish to share our bounty with you. It is not a sin to be poor but it is unfair to deny our children happiness, when people are willing to help make it possible, out of love.
2. Toiletries & Cosmetics
Make sure to join us on the Sweet Stamps blog, we'd love to see what you create. You have a chance at winning $20 to purchase some "sweet" things of your own!! There's plenty of wonderful "sweet" things to choose from!
Doesn't such a statement imply a previous tolerance for street crime? That while certain strata of society predate on one another up and down our communities and high streets, with petty theft, mugging as theft with violence, all the way up to knife crime, the government have been happy to turn a blind eye to this at a strategic level. The underclass preying on one another.
5. This is the version from the "Let It Be Naked" version, where Phil Spector's silly strings and heavenly choruses that were added without the Beatles got taken out.
Great Divide Brewing Company Old Ruffian Barley Wine
The day the music died
Put olive oil into a pot with a volume of at least 1.5l. After a minute, add the oignons. When they are glassy, add the other vegetables, tomatoes last. Cook on medium heat.
People ask all the time, “Where should I go next?”
So this weeks Smurf Report is the second week we are looking at another movie recommended by Empire Magazine’s “The 50 Must-See Movies of 2011″ – The Inbetweeners Movie!
Was ACEN what I expected? In many ways yes and no. It was a ton of fun, even if we spent well over seven hours just standing in line. But let me tell you, between shaking LittleKuriboh’s hand (twice!) and getting that video for my sister, I can honestly say that it was one of the best experiences of my life. You can expect to see me in Rosemont Illinois next year, prepared for an even better time, if that’s possible.
Now I’m becoming more and more… ok isn’t exactly the word I wanted, but it’s the best I can think of now, about the fact that TS is a part of my life I’ll have to deal with. I couldn’t even think about googling “turner syndrome” until recently, but I realized that getting information is vital. That’s how I found out that many things I’ve faced are related to my condition (for example, difficulties learning how to drive, a fairly common issue from what I’ve read)… Others have been there too. I also learned about many things that could have happened but didn’t.
While undergoing a difficulty one may not be able to fully understand how this is supposed to be beneficial. However, as Steve Jobs said in his commencement speech, you can only connect the dots looking back.
There are hundreds, if not thousands, of recipes available in books and on the Internet for different kinds of homebrew. One of the potential problems with this embarassment of riches is that one does not always know whether the recipe is any good. And you don't necessarily know whether the recipe really conforms to its purported style.
The gold cost here is relatively small, but farming Kurenai rep will take a while. The best way to do this is to complete all the quests in Nagrand and then kill ogres/cultists in Nagrand. Lots of them. Keep killing them until you hit Exalted. You can hand in the warbeads that drop from ogres for Kurenai rep too, or you can keep them for Consortium rep if you are achievement hunting in general.
would you like to join our fabulous design team? We are looking for a couple of new Design Team members.
The state cannot evade this obligation. It can’t say, “I am busy, I have more important things to do.” There is nothing more important than protecting citizens’ lives. Nothing.
At our centers in India and the U.S., we have created powerfully consecrated spaces where experiencing a samadhi state comes about very naturally. These samadhis are very pleasant, blissful and ecstatic. There are also samadhis that are beyond this.
Swelling anywhere: Nope...well other than my tummy :-)
Even as I try to avoid it all, the news comes up and there in my face is yet another arsewipe move.
2) Make Your Own Diapers
Maybe I shouldn't be bummed that Goose Island or Murphy's didn't make the cut.
so this little cutie is now sitting next to my crafting chair all ready for me to resume my crafting activities! Thank you so much Sue, it is just what I needed!!
"Why do you need to get the house clean?"
Predicted: LT, Matt Kalil
Cook until syrup comes to a boil, washing down sides of pan with a wet pastry brush as needed. Boil, gently swirling pan occasionally, until mixture is caramelized and just reaches 360°F. Remove from heat and slowly pour in cream; stir with a wooden spoon until smooth. Stir in sea salt.
–$6 billion for colleges/universities (many which have billion dollar endowments)
A-Being 1 of only 108 people to go down by the wreck site of the Titanic and seeing it, only 10 feet away from my submersible window. It was very surreal and awesome. Sometimes I still can’t believe I was down there.
At my 26 week ultrasound the neonatologist that my perinatologist asked to join my case, seemed to think that Stella had grown all she was going to grow and that by leaving her in any longer we risked her dying inside me. The ultrasound from that day showed that she was approximately 13oz and the neonatologist assured us that ultrasounds usually underestimate weight. I was scheduled for a C-Section the next morning. I was scared to death, knew that the chances of my daughter’s survival were low, and I was not ready to face this.
I have no tolerance for this.
For a wonder, Notia did as bidden. Pevan pushed the Four Knot from her mind, quickly followed by Dagdan. The world came down to the image of Van Raighan's sleek, lean face disappearing into a circle of sky and the unseen but instinctively known outline of the Gate's residue.
There were no injuries. The boresighter was found most of the way to the 100yd target holders. These pictures are being sent to several appropriate persons - the club's newsletter director, R/O director, club president, etc. The weapon was a fairly ordinary Savage, and I believe it was in .30-06 or a related cartridge. It is hoped that the barrel will be purchased for or donated to the club's hunter education program. Pay attention folks!Plus, he has a simply outstanding rant about idjits who ignore basic range safety rules. RTWT.
3. Make your own baby food. Avoid all the preservatives of canned baby food and make your own with organic fruits and vegetables. Even doing this just once or twice a week can prevent tons of gallons of pesticide from being sprayed on plants, as well as preventing hundreds of jars from being thrown away.
His younger half sister Maya Soetoro is nine years his junior and born in Jakarta, would she necessarily know the full details of his birth? I know where I am told my own elder brother was born but I wasn’t there and have never seen his birth certificate. (although I am sure he would show it to me if I asked)
Hot dog and drink included with admission
Brinkman Grills Reviews (brinkmangrillsreviews.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Choose your style.
What has this got to do with writing for children?
I dont know why I was in the mood to make a Christmas card. I just felt like using snowflakes today!
Welcome to College by Jonathan Morrow
-Anti-viral/bacterial/fungal medications: Man, I hate the meds!
The changes proposed by the FBI to the training modules are a welcomed first step in ensuring that such a mistake does not occur again in the future. The group asked the FBI Director to issue a formal statement on this matter acknowledging the negative impact of these training materials on the Muslim community. Representatives from the community and interfaith organizations also stressed the importance of transparency by the Bureau in dealing with these matters, and suggested that a committee of community leaders and experts be assembled to review training material issued by the FBI. Meeting participants requested that the training process be open and transparent moving forward, and requested future meetings with Director Mueller to continue the conversation.
it is dark
I remember also thinking, God Green Day really did nick this stuff wholesale from Stiff Little Fingers, didn’t they?
Every action has a consequence though. Call it Karma, seed, time and harvest, whatever you like. Like it or a not, a lot of the homosexual community has gotten STD’s. Why? Because every action has a consequence. Just like straight people who have a lot of unprotected sex generally have STD’s. Every action has a consequence. That’s simply the balance of the universe.
Many people is worried. It is sad!
Icy roads and slick sidewalks increase the chances of accidents. Know your liability and do what you can to minimize your exposure. If your property is slippery, get out and remove the ice, lay down a gritting agent, or put signs in easy view so visitors and employees will know to proceed with caution. Train your employees regarding Winter safety including heating and generator use.
My poor car.
I love this book; it almost makes me wish to walk into a pub, and then scares me slightly off doing so.
Even though you possess plenty, you are still indigent. You abound in temporal possessions, but you need things eternal. You listen to the needs of a human beggar, yet yourself are a beggar of God. What you do with those who beg from you is what God will do with His beggar. You are filled and you are empty. Fill your empty neighbor with your fullness, so that your emptiness may be filled from God’s fullness. — St. Augustine http://origin.ewtn.com/devotionals/inspiration.asp#16
This site, offers a lot of information on decomposers explaining the importance of their work for the rest of the environment. It also has an interview to a worm that is intended to change wrong
Just as our intercession alleviates the suffering of the souls in Purgatory, so too are we called to alleviate the suffering of the sick with our prayers and attention. Debilitation from illness can be lonely and frightening. Our loving prayers and physical presence is a balm to those enveloped in pain, weakness, and suffering. In a previous post I offered suggestions on how we can make a loving difference to those who are ill. Ultimately, our time and attention, whether in the form of cards and letters, phone calls or email, or by physically attending to the needs of the sick, all provide well-documented relief (in medical, psychological and religious journals). The Corporal Work of Mercy calling us to visit the sick reminds us to follow the example of Jesus the healer by extending our hand to those who are ill.
Add the soured milk to the eggs and vanilla, then add all of the wet ingredients to the dry and gently mix. A few lumps are okay, but don't overmix! Be sure to allow the mixed batter to sit for about 10 minutes, until you see bubbles.
UBC’s capacity to support faculty, staff and students, through the provision
Sunset yacht sailing with lots of bikinis shots, good food, lots of booze and great fun out at sea.
The show is called Artiscape, and here are the details:
The Daily Mail UK newspaper, whose reporter has more time to read blogs than I do, quotes an older post (without supplying the link) from the mother-to-be:
Glad's new "To Go" line. BPA free containers with a little cup for dressing or dip that snaps into the underside of the lid. It's different. It's practical. We'll see if they're a hit once school starts.
We ask whether it was this licence, issued in January 2011, that ensured that Masing and his key 8 PRS seats remained supportive of Taib and BN?
‘ The repetition of the blocks resulted in too much uniformity. Every natural thing was excluded: no tree or grassy area broke the monotony… the result was more a necropolis than a metropolis, a sterile landscape of asphalt and cement, inhuman in every aspect.’
and the house timbers creak.
White Gumz Crew
B/BR - Bud Count and Branching
II Samuel 8:17
The Box of Chocolates was my first recipe from the book. It uses sixteen mini cupcakes, although the chocolate box I was using only fit fourteen.
Lord of all, to Thee we raise
Then Wednesday at 2:15 is time for the Western Reader Round-up. There will be prizes, TV western Trivia and line dancing. Pull on your books, grab your hat and come along to the round-up. The authors include CH Admirand, Vivian Arend, Lori Armstrong, Cindy Holby (hey that’s me) Cat Johnson, Janette Kenny, Amanda McIntyre, Bobbie Smith and Beth Williamson. Did I mention Mr. Romance 2011 Len Gunn and contestant Scott Nova will be there for pictures? It’s going to be a rocking good time.
I'm talking about Hide and Seek in the park.
BUT I JUST CAN’T BEAR…
Thompson (1995. 212) refers to the impact of traditional media when he explains that as individuals’ understandings are unrestricted by face-to-face interaction but instead shaped by overlapping networks of communication, our interactions become “… a form of vicarious travel which enables individuals to distance themselves from the immediate locales of their day-to-day lives.” His words as apt –if not more- if they concerned the development of self and identity within virtual worlds. I Argue that the development of such different characters and identities within virtual worlds now and perhaps more so into the future can inform people of the characters creator/player especially in terms of the way they present themselves or act online and off. This sounds especially true when we hear the founder of facebook say “the level of transparency the world has now, won’t support having two identities for a person.” (Kirkpatrick. 2010. p198)
But I think "Enjoy your retirement" suited the motif.
Bi-Rite Market’s Eat Good Food by Sam Mogannam and Dabney Gough (Ten Speed Press, 2011. Photography by France Ruffenach)
So after picking up my medal, less than 3 hours after arriving it was time to go back via the Heathrow Express and the 5th and final airport, Heathrow(5). I was then picked up from Belfast International by a friend who very kindly drove me to Donegal where my wife and friends has started the holiday, I arrived just after midnight. One thought I had was that models do this sort of travelling all the time - maybe not quite as extreme -and they do it week in and week out, I don't know how they manage it and still be so cheery and fresh during our shoots.
We’ve got baby stuff to buy, closets to clean out, a 6th birthday to celebrate, eggs to hunt, unfinished projects to complete and fun house guests coming. So, if you’ll excuse me, I’m going to take a little break and will be back early-ish next week.
Marcella Daniels (vocals track 9)
The phrase that is annoying me today is 'longer hours', as in, 'People are being asked to work longer hours', 'Longer hours are bad for your health', 'Recession means longer hours at work', et cetera. This is absurd. An hour is an hour, it can't be longer or shorter. People may be being asked to work more hours. Many hours at work may be bad for your health, but each hour remains the same, neither longer nor shorter.
Now 2007, he weighs at a stunning 229 pounds, losing 401 pounds but still has excess skin on his body.
But, Christians need to have a definite problem with this. We are not to “empty our minds” in any way, shape or form. To do so is nothing short of opening the door for demonic spirits to enter our minds and control our thinking. God gave us our minds to use for thinking and reasoning in a sensible manner — not for artificial manipulation into mindlessness. All of Christian prayer and meditation is to be an honest and intelligent communication with our Creator and Redeemer. We are not to use vain repetitions of any sort. Jesus says in Matthew 6:7,
Ruthie was from Scotland. She was the frailer of the two. She walked hunched and had to sit often. Her most striking feature was her smooth, wrinkleless skin. For someone who lived in the blazing sun of Hawaii, especially someone from the weatherly Scottish northern coasts, she possessed the preverbal porcelain skin of a doll made of china. She was a living contradiction as she walked and shuffled, bent over slightly at the waist with her curving back. She would tilt her head over in your direction when walking and flash you the most perfect and mischievous smile. She looked like she was going fast with her short steps and her arms swinging with purpose when she walked. And while taking in this scene I would notice she was wrapped in the smoothest alabaster skin with not a wrinkle on her face – not even a single laugh line.
Image/Stamp-Cutest Piglet Ever by Studio 313
That I would once again end up with a useless piece of crap
Jackson Brown Doctor my eyes US
To participate in this GO GREEN challenge please be sure to leave the DIRECT LINK to your challenge submission via Mister Linky. All submissions must be new as of 3/1/10 and be linked up by the due date 3/14/10. Also be sure to mention C.S.D. & WILD OLIVE KIDS in your blog postings so we know we are looking at the correct submission.
Topics of Interest. Analytic deciders generally like to win but are also passionate about keeping their analytic “Occam’s Razor” sharp. This site is dedicated to topics that would be interesting to them:
While the dough is rising, cook the sausages in a pan with a tablespoon of water over medium-low heat for six to eight minutes.
Posted by Justin "The Claw" at 12:38 AM 0 comments
Eventually she asked me something she'd never asked me before- how I'd feel if I was the one who had been disappointed. I told her that I might have been sad and angry, and that I would have felt my feelings until I was done. And then I would have tried to enjoy the rest of my day. It was really interesting to have that exchange with her.
I’m not doing well with my ever-worsening health situation, but I must say that I’ve gotten enormous comfort over the years by reflecting upon other people’s misery. Based upon my own experiences and what I’ve read, I’ve learned two things about chronic pain: there’s often very little that doctors can do to alleviate it; and the only limit to how much pain a person can experience is determined by the point at which he passes out, and even then he has to wake up again. I’ve read about people whom, if I were them, and had I been able to use a gun on myself, I would have run to that gun. I draw two conclusions from such somber reflections. One is that I’m lucky compared to how bad off I could be. The second is that to truly allow the knowledge of such pain into my heart has made life seem a lot more serious. When I was young, I pretended that life was simply a game that I would someday tire of, and then go back to my real existence; but, no, our lives are as real—and sometimes as horrific—as when a leopard crushes the windpipe of an impala.
“Aye, full of surprises, that one,” grumbled the Pred.
It's just that I am one of those irritatingly annoying wives that Don't Say Anything when they are Really Pissed Off.
10. Pajarillo Barrenquero
On the whole – Breezes is a fairly pedestrian venue. I guess it’s what you can expect from a soulless restaurant in a large casino complex. The service was appallingly slow… in the end, I had to raise my hand (like a school kid) to get someone to get us the bill. All this, while a strange suited man stood in the middle of the restaurant looking something like a bouncer… it was very wierd.
(1) Right at the crack of 10am, I was on the phone to the nicest lady at Susie Paperie in Hailey, Idaho. On my short list of stamper-stars to meet is Dave Brethauer from Memory Box. His coloring techniques are amazing, as are his card constructions. Very simple, tight, and impactful. Love them. So I got an autographed copy of his book, Card Design, when in Spokane and have devoured it with fervor. Long story short, he's coming to Idaho and my BFF and I are in seats #1 and #2. Can. Not. Wait.
She's such a sweet lady and her children are adorable. LeeAnn is one, and maybe only woman, I know that has convinced her husband that blogging isn't a cult. And we're not some angry women who hate men and bitch about the dishes. (oops, that's just me)
Even the Happy Birthday part? Gee these guys are tough. You’d think a blood sucking vampire would have a heart. Where else do you drive the stake?
SAPA reports on Friday that many petrol stations and food shops in all the major townships are empty of supplies.
assaulting my piano (poor piano, he endures Chopin, Beethoven, Mozart when things are very bad, and when I'm more relaxed he puts up with Vaughan Wiliams, Debussy and Ravel)
I’ve thought it out very carefully
It’s a long shot, but it’s Mr. Gingrich’s Hail Mary – much as John McCain, with his similarly challenged campaign, threw the Sarah Palin Hail Mary – not with conviction that he was choosing carefully, but precisely with the knowledge that choosing carefully doomed him, and that only an apparently reckless long-shot, which might, just might, open into some kind of excitement and momentum, was his only hope.
Oh, and I owe you a winner of the three Amy Tangerine mini books from the Diana Fisher blog hop from last week!!! I used Random.org which chose Brooke who said:
Yesterday we had Lil' Miss's newborn pictures taken. It was only 19* outside, but the photographer is a convenient 2 miles away so we braved the cold. Her studio stays a balmy 81* to keep baby all cozy and sleepy so it wasn't that bad ('cept I wore a sweater and wished I hadn't since we were there for 3 hours!)
If you've actually made it this far, and aren't second guessing your decision to be at ACL, I'm going to give the low-down on what IS good on Friday. (Just about everything IMHO). This is the day to be there.
Brother Dobie was probably best known for the 1973 ballad Drift Away--and we'll dig on that in a bit. But his first date with stardom came with 1965's The In Crowd, a hip if elitist manifesto to the benefits of belonging to the right group. Best lyric in the song: "We make every minute count/Our share is always the biggest amount." Gangsta!!
Unfortunately, Christine won’t give up much of anything besides the race of her supposed attackers, and everyone is somewhat wary of what this might mean. She does say that one of the men had dreadlocks, and a tip leading to a health store turns up an African American man with the right hair. But this guy only delivers illegal drugs to Christine. He points them in the direction of another possible suspect- a (white) delivery driver named Kevin.
The ice creams are made with coconut milk and sweetened with apple juice, and come in chocolate, lemon, strawberry and vanilla flavours. The brand is already stocked in more than 130 outlets UK-wide, including Whole Foods in London and Glasgow, Holland & Barrett, Kew Gardens, Rainforest Café, Planet Organic and Brighton’s Sunny Foods. While they contain no nuts the ice creams are, however, produced in a factory where nut ingredients are used.
Whilst it’s well worth trying to speak to a manager or senior individual if possible please bear in mind most people taking calls will be low paid receptionist/admin staff so we call on people to be be business-like and non-confrontational. Be aware that is an offence to make telephone calls which are threatening, indecent or offensive. Keep it fluffy. Why not sing them a carol?
I made the pesto, threw the sandwiches on the griddle, and by the time I was done loading the dishwasher, I had perfect Italian sandwich love ready for eating. Now that's my kind of dinner, folks.
Not only that, when dictators unleash their special murder squads Tahrir squares turn into the peoples’ militias. In Libya and in Syria the pro-democracy uprising has become an armed struggle which opens the potential for socialist revolution. Even to win basic democratic rights it will be necessary to confront and defeat the state. Imperialism is therefore constrained to keep the lid on by posing as ‘democratic’ (bombing for ‘peace’ in Libya to ‘protect civilians’) and thus converting ‘pro-democratic’ resistance to its military intervention into a threat to ‘democracy’ i.e. terrorism or crime.
Also, using Catalyst which has amino acids that support & preseve muscle ton, enhances strength & energy during workouts and helps rid the fat, retain the muscle.
Okay. Here’s a big problem I have with that whole “pitchers and catchers” thing. It’s changed quite a bit from when I was a kid. Though it’s always been optional for anyone other than pitchers and catchers, it’s almost required now. But it’s not. Sort of. But it’s expected too. Sort of.
I’ve learned a thing or two about pain in the last couple of years. First, I find it surprising just how much physical pain some people can endure without much complaint. Second, it is clear to me that I’m a pain wimp.
A corporation for a government is not the American way!
Invasive Lobular Carcinoma (ILC)
General Wei stood and looked down at the radioman. “Tell the colonel to get those recon squads moving now!”
We tend to desire the approval of people we look up to and to fear the disapproval of the same. Some of this is normal and healthy, a matter of common sense. Most every child desires to please his parents. Spouses yearn for the approbation of their spouses. Employees want their bosses to be pleased with them and fear arousing their ire due to poor performance.
3. The movie made almost half a billion dollars world wide. Half a billion. They’re already planning two sequels.
Maybe I'm old-fashioned, but I think our history still counts for something. Besides, I can't just shack up with France. What would the neighbors think?
Clearly, those running such organisations believe it is more important to protect a politically correct fantasy than it is to actually protect women from being raped.
And I am looking forward to share it with all of you.
United though never looked like grabbing an equaliser and Yaya Toure came agonisingly close to putting the game to bed on 80 when he hit another shot just wide of the post. Clichy forced de Gea into a good save with a low drive and Samir Nasri later tried to walk the ball into the net as the Citizens looked dangerous on the counter attack and United were unable to break down a magnificent Man City defence. The champions threw hopeful balls into the box during the 5 minutes of added time but came up short as they have done in their recent Premier League games, which means City go top on goal difference with just two games remaining and few would bet against them relinquishing that position.
And if given the choice as team Captain would you choose someone who isn't really that good? Tough choice huh!
There is a stark difference between defining ones own concept of existence, which I am totally in favor of, as it appears that this could be directly referring to religious freedom, and having that concept be formalized into a law that overrides my concept of existence. How do the two co-exist? Well, in short you vote on the people who decide which concept of existence trumps the other (legally anyways).
The Imperial Media Department refutes any claims that long-range scanners picked up a titanic explosion in the area, dismissing them as malicious gossip.
7. Be prepared to ditch large amounts of work if necessary. If something’s not working, then change it to make the project successful. We had to change everything, including our timeline, materials, and even who would be working on it.
I opened a post office box for the first time in my life, and am enjoying the sense of freedom that comes with the tiny feat. Independence.
Eriq and Jessica walked in and immediately set up Dragonframes (stop motion capture and monitoring program). Great to work with people who know what they are doing (because I don’t know):
Challenge 5: February 26
Khizar Iqbal (Con) 1784
All in all it was a truly wonderful weekend with a combined audience of about 240. Now on to the rest of the season. And, of course, a shameless plug: Information can be found at www.ccpt.org .
"Ever wondered why this magazine is quite so brilliant? Well, I’ve just scanned it with the sonic and guess what? The whole thing is made out of psychic paper! It knows exactly what you want to read, and makes it appear before your eyes!"
The Governor’s Ball in the State Dining Room. Do you see Governor Arnold? I love that the President is pulling out his wife’s chair! This dress by Peter Soronen was a stunner with the huge pearl necklace accessorizing it.
This is a fascinating longitudinal research study with lots of interesting findings. The report focuses on findings related to year 9 dispositions in key areas such as enjoyment of school, academic self-concept, popularity, citizenship values and anxiety. It also compares previous research findings which involved the same participants when they were in years 2 and 5 so it very much looks at the way young people’s attitudes develop over time. A mixed-methods approach was used. It reveals worrying findings relating to confidence and motivation in languages.
As soon as you begin to live the life of faith in God, fascinating and physically gratifying possibilities will open up before you. These things are yours by right, but if you are living the life of faith you will exercise your right to waive your rights, and let God make your choice for you. God sometimes allows you to get into a place of testing where your own welfare would be the appropriate thing to consider, if you were not living the life of faith. But if you are, you will joyfully waive your right and allow God to make your choice for you. This is the discipline God uses to transform the natural into the spiritual through obedience to His voice.
I have just completed a my second cut-out book “A World Without…” The book was hardback bound and embossed at the wonderful Bristol Bound. The book consists of 180 hand cut pages, which have had anything to do with bees cut out of the pages. I started simply removing the bees, then products to do with bees, pollination processes, etc.. until I reached the end of the book where I removed all the words. (referring to the highly debated Einstein quote: “If the bee disappears from the surface of the Earth, man would have no more than four years left to live.”)
“Two passengers needed medical treatment to remove debris from their eyes, and the man decided to catch a ferry back to Auckland rather than fly.” Herald reported.
I write all of this to lay out briefly the arena in which this battle of ideas is joined. It is an arena chosen by Daniel Yergin in which he has many preponderant advantages. He may be a Pulitzer Prize-winning historian with no formal geological training, but he's also the head honcho of the world's most recognized brand in energy advice, Cambridge Energy Research Associates (now absorbed by IHS). He is a frequent face at Congressional hearings and a man who hobnobs with kings and prime ministers the whole world wide. It is hard to convince anyone at the top levels that he doesn't know what he's talking about, especially when the world's major newspapers and broadcast venues give him access usually reserved for high government officials.
I’ve shared the ointment when I had some insect bites, which smells of beeswax. It seemed to act more like a soothing and protective layer though.
I missed my train last year thanks to the bottle of BOOBs chardonnay I drank on Saturday night. Maria has promised me that won't happen this year. I love to talk to others, but sometimes need a bit of warming up to get to my normal self. I am terrible at inviting myself along with a group because I don't want to feel like a burden. I am ready for a weekend of drinking a little too much, laughing until my face and abs hurt, and running on little to no sleep! WHO'S WITH ME?!
Having failed in my attempts to get seasonal beers over Easter, with the sole exception of the mad rabbit one, May brings plenty more opportunities to drink seasonal here in Germany, as breweries turn loose their Maibocks. I have to admit, I didn't even buy any of the below, as they were left as offerings at my door, and one on the lawnmower as a thanks for cutting the grass and getting one of my neighbours out of potential trouble with his significant other. It's nice having a reputation as a beer geek, sometimes.
The rest of the economy was in synch. The stock market had never been higher, there were jobs in abundance and 10% of the work force were “New Irish” – immigrants, mostly from Eastern Europe, who had come to Ireland to work. Ireland was riding high, with, on paper, on of the highest per capita incomes in the world. The Celtic Tiger was roaring. . We believed the rhetoric, our hubris knew no bounds. Like Icarus we flew higher and higher. The unique and temporary set of circumstances which had combined to create our prosperity was regarded as something immutable and that prosperity itself as our manifest destiny. Life was good. Irish people, on an unprecedented scale, were enjoying North American standards of living, with rising social benefits to boot. Our infrastructure, long the butt of visitors’ jokes, was being modernised The population had reached levels not seen for over a century and the demographics were promising, with the youngest population and the fewest old people in Western Europe.
Another theme: hops are hot, yeast is not. The first or second PIB I attended had several funky Belgians--including two or three world-class lambics (Cantillon, I believe). This year, there were no straight lambics and the fruit lambics were all of the large commercial variety--emphasis on sweet. Most of the Belgians tended to emphasize strength over sour--probably a reflection of Portlanders' tastes. On the other hand, there were hops a'poppin. Even in Belgian and German beers.
The celebration of Beltane often involves a bonfire. Bel is the Celtic Sun God, and “Beltane” translates from the Anglo Saxon as “Bel Fire”. On this day fires in village homes were extinguished and then relit from the central bonfire/belfire.
French seams! I took out about an inch from each side seam. AND, omg, my first ever rolled hem! Let me tell you - I could have sat there rolling hems all flippin' night long. So lovely. I was litterally bummed when I finished the hem. Ha! I chopped off about an inch from the bottom - both to shorten the blouse and to account for the hem allowance. The length is perfect now. Awesome.
The mice said "We have had to run all of our lives; from cats, dogs, people with brooms. If we could just have some little roller skates, we would not have to run again."
Chilly, chilly is evening time
fiber
“Have you ever been in love?”
She doesn’t come into the office. Nobody does. It’s his one safe place. His sanctuary from the house and the world. His ‘work room’, the work she never asks about. He closes the door behind him and twists the lock shut.
Phantastes, Lilith, et al. – MacDonald
To make matters worse, a young girl’s body is found buried on the Carrington estate is unearthed years later and Peter is indicted for murder–days after he returns from his honeymoon with Kay.
Some interesting insights for Stoke fans particularly how Clough managed to sign Peter Shilton from us. Apparently Clough went to see Shilton played for Stoke at Mansfield Town and asked him did he really want to play at such grounds when he could play for Forest in Division One (now the Premier League). Needless to say Shilton signed for Forest…thanks a lot Mansfield! Overall a book to be enjoyed by any football fan and as a long standing admirer of Clough’s management style it reinforces the fact that he was indeed a one off. Clough’s biggest regret was that he never managed England but then you can see why as the FA would have dreaded having Clough giving any sort of pre or post match interview!
The founding Board consisted of:
I believe that yes a casino in Toronto could generate financial stability. Does it have to be down town? Toronto already has the ACC, the CN tower, and the Skydome all packed in the downtown core. I believe the government should try to broaden their horizons and see where a casino could last in the next 50 years. This cannot be a quick fix solution or a spontaneous lot purchase. If McGuinty and the liberal government understand their citizens they know they have to go through many drafts, because if Toronto get’s a casino their will be high expectations.
This hutch was my grandmother's. Probably from the late 1950s. It sat in my grandparents' house for as long as we can all remember. It's not anything particularly expensive or fancy, but it definitely has good bones. I don't have much from my grandmother, so this piece is very special to me. Although I liked the wood finish, it was a little beat up (mostly from me using it as extra counter space in our previously tiny kitchen) and was begging for some TLC.
“Its okay, honestly. These things happen,” I said with a fixed grin plastered all over my facehole, mentally plotting on how I was going to get my revenge on the little furry shitbag.
You're not the last you're not the first
In the meantime pass this information onto others and let us see whether the media cover this story or if it is covered up.
Despite these developments, Romney believes that the Massachusetts plan is working. But the Mass plan is not the Obama plan. Romney opposes ObamaCare because of the public option (subsequently deleted form the bill) and because mandatory health insurance should be tailored by each state to meet their needs; let the states be “laboratories of democracy.” In the event ObamaCare is adopted, Romney proposes the inter-state sale of health insurance to increase competition.
She said he was a homeless man, said he always rode his bike to the fruit stand, said she gave him oranges
The Big Bad was a big disappointment. It came out of nowhere while also being utterly predictable. There was no build up or subtle suspicion on the part of the MC, and so there was also no depth or development to the villain.
I miss her so much already.
Craft thread
The law identifies the state’s emblem, its national anthem and the respective provisions.
-Your blog name/address
Large baking sheet
Me: Just because you hate being wrong. Now we’ve missed the whole Denzel Washington interview.
When to decorate for Christmas?? I am the type of person that puts my tree up days before Christmas. I start making Christmas ornaments and preparing for the holiday around December 1st but I do not put any decorations up until around the 12-15th and no tree up until the 20th at the earliest. Wyatt's birthday is in the beginning of December so it is great to not focus on the holidays too much before his birthday so he still gets his own special time. Growing up we always decorated our tree on Christmas eve and we loved it! This year I think we will start decorations on the 14th and the tree is going up on the 21st.
1 cup red quinoa
Weight Watchers suggest for an added weight loss boost - which I need because the scales won't move down - you stick to 26pps a day with no weeklies, with meal plans they give you. Ok, so I can't afford to be buying different things every day that they suggest to eat. I've been with WW on and off for 2 years now, I know how it works. I've been eating sensibly all week with the odd treat worked into my 26PP allowance.
PERFECT FOR: Hot summers in the city when an oldies radio station isn’t readily available.
'They're gone,' he said. 'Changed. All of them. You hear me? I... I SEE THEM!'
Suede – See Leather.
Twenty-five minutes into the movie, the tone changes dramatically. On reaching the way station, Brennan finds the station manager and his son have been killed in a particularly nasty fashion by outlaw Frank Usher (Richard Boone) and his henchmen. (Remember this was just four years after the success of “Shane”, when kids were almost never killed off in the movies.)
Delirium
But one of the lines I stood in — at the college bookstore — took me right past a bargain bin. And just look at what I carried out for one measly dollar:
This wasn't an official CBE event, but there's no reason more of us can't organize such get-togethers on the website or Facebook group page. Feel free to use these forums to schedule the kinds of beer events you want. There certainly is an audience on either site.
So remember that to enter the challenge you can use either the theme or the Sketch or both. Its up to you.
Here is singer Frank Orrall playing 'Pulling Touch' at a recent dinner party(?)... if you watch, give it a minute to rev up, then imagine that it has the energy and and vitality that twenty years have mellowed.
Hooded Fang – Tosta Mista
See it… And if you’re Pursuing Film Making, Own it… And watch it over, and over, and over again.
LOVE it! LOL!
ALKALINE FOODS
So named because it reminds me of cartoon panels whenever a character gets punched. Kapow!
Gregory: what can Obama say to Republicans
Please go and pay Lou a visit but make a cuppa first, there are so many gorgeous cards to see there you could be gone a long while!
"Number One Nemesis"
every bay was occupied.
Razali, who described himself as a responsible Muslim, was quoted in Utusan as saying that he knew the “true story” behind what happened at the function, in a hotel in Macalister Road, where the alleged conspiracy was hatched.
When I first visited England in the Thatcherite eighties, immigration and asylum were already raging issues.
This contradicts what Alpert states on the website:
TGIF.......big snowstorm here in Chicago today. There is no better place to be than in my studio creating during a snowstorm! :)
I spent a good time recapping various WoW details that probably didn’t need to be recapped, especially since I didn’t do research. Brulee also seems to act a bit too pouty here for being a full-grown adult paladin, but I wanted to convey that she did not want to leave her sister alone. Also, I really need to work on Northern accents some more. Time for me to be spending some more time down at the Pig & Whistle…
I'll be going on vacation for a week beginning tomorow and will not have my computer with me but have pre-posted a new prompt for Saturday night and the request for next Wednesday. Hope everything works fine! I'll catch up with everyone then.
Kat, another FYA who’s spending her summer in Spain, said it would be okay, really, if we could just bring the whole center with us. All the teachers and administration we’ve come to love over the past six months. All the friends we’ve made in both semesters. It would be okay, really, if everything could just stay the same.
In fact, the real big moment for the Hatter is when the Cheshire Cat helps him escape his beheading and he rallies the animals of Underland to rise up against the Red Queen. They do, and they all (like, maybe 6 of them) hurry off to the White Queen’s place, where they … well, where they try to convince Alice to do the real fighting.
This Sunday’s edition of El Comercio has a headline embarrassing to the country’s national library. Next to a picture of an old, valuable book the sub-headline reads, Biblioteca Nacional perdio dos mil libros (National Library lost two thousand books)
Interesting characters make interesting stories, not the other way around. An author develops interesting characters by putting them under pressure, giving them much to lose, and letting them change because of their experiences. And the author makes these characters at least a bit larger than life. Who wants to read about characters who sit around watching television all the time or who repeatedly have the same tiresome argument with their children or who can’t resolve their problems? We deal with that every day. We don’t need to read about it. On the other hand, if the traits are too idealized, characters come across as comic book silly.
About a Boy -- Cute, and I liked that Hugh's romance is almost an afterthought in the movie, and he doesn't fall in love with the boy's mother -- 3 hearts
We all ran back into the classroom, jumping behind our desks and 'fell asleep' (in gaelic) before she picked herself up and trudged back into the room!
Christine looks only momentarily thoughtful as she holds back some laughs. The sight of me right now would be enough to make anybody laugh!
We all know the idiom “Calm before the Storm”, but I’d like to introduce (or revisit) “the Low after the High”. This weekend and the few weeks leading up to it have been full of energy and achievement. We’ve had wonderful family devotions, learnt valuable lessons, applied those lessons and seen the fruit of our labours. We have been deeply aware of God’s blessing in our lives on every level, and the activity seemed to culminate in DH preaching one of his most successful sermons on Sunday.
We will let you know if our arrival is going to be on Sat.! Pray hard!
To gaze upon His beauty of the LORD
And if you want to say Hello All you need to say Horas
But beekeeping is fast becoming a global monoculture. Africanized honey bees produce more honey, and therefore are an economically attractive option for bee keepers. In the Mayan tradition, a priest harvested stingless bee honey as part of a religious ceremony twice a year. Over harvesting kills the colony. Native bees may simply starve as deforestation, forest fragmentation and hurricanes reduce the availability of the floral resources they need.
We have intention of going to the beach again today, and hopefully I shall remember the camera.
MYLUNE: Oh thank you, Mr. Orc! Thank for saving the poor dear sweet beautiful wyvern from harm! So so much! Oh it makes me so happy!
The NYT has always been against Term Limits for the city's elected officials. Today the paper calls on the voters to vote no on question number 1 which calls for rolling back term limits from three terms to two. Voting on the Fine Print. Follow the tradition has become more important that the reality of bad government caused by New Yorkers unable to vote their elected officials out of office. The Times understands that Koch's group to throw the bums out failed in every attempt to beat an incumbent. The NYT knows the election system in this state and city is some gamed by incumbents that the public no long has the ability to vote elected officials out of office. Yet the NYT editorials has by continuing to following unworkable solution of counting on the voters to change government, has become somewhat dysfunctional itself. NYT this past May 16th wrote an Jobs for Albany’s Do-Nothings in which the paper ask the voters to Throw the Bums out.
Other former Soviet states succeeded by freeing up their markets, privatizing state-owned businesses, eliminating bureaucracy, and loosening regulation. These measures created very large middle classes across the region, and made the contributing entrepreneurs very wealthy.
Well, of course, this particular Fruitloopmum had trouble deciding which category I might fit into cos it really depends on the day of the week and whether there’s a full moon. Also, there wasn’t a category for ‘Bo-ho sex siren, funky chick, I’ve lost the plot but hey I’ve remembered where I left the dog, does my face need ironing goddess’….so I didn’t actually find anything that I thought would suit me.
(They) are singers and musicians.
People tend to accept their behaviour as “normal”, meaning as the norm or as most people do. But this is usually farthest from the truth. This kind of attitude comes with a sense that whatever it is that others do that deviates from one’s behaviour, is not “normal” and should be either corrected or pointed out as “deviant”. If one took the time to understand why some people behave like “this” or like “that” and why their responses are as valid to them as ours are valid to us, we would start grasping the concept of tolerance. It’s not that what you say is wrong, it simply a matter of perspective.
You may consider the preceding an ironic statement considering Star Trek: The Motion Picture also feels as though it is marginally Trek. It has a distinct feel compared to the remaining film in the series. This notion, more than any other, convinces many fans that the feel of TOS was due more to Gene L. Coon than Gene Roddenberry. I will elaborate more later, but when Roddenberry was kicked upstairs, the franchise was handed over to Harve Bennett for Star Trek II: The Wrath of Khan. He viewed the entire series in order to get a feel for what the show was about. He took the best elements to craft the subsequent films. The best elements evidently being those Roddenberry had nothing to do with.
They had arrived at the wake teary and shocked about the unfateful news of fellow BOF cast Jang Ja Yeon‘s death.
Holly sits at her desk.
If my parents had given me that gift when I was six, it would have been strange and inappropriate. I would’ve wondered what it was for and how to use it. My parents knew what to give and when to give it.
So the only question remaining is which nimble app startup firm is going to build this?
So, how do I feel now? Luckier than ever. Thankful to be an all boy mom. Excited to meet each day to hear what I never knew I wanted to know (did you know that if you put a lighter to one's butt as they fart, they could suck the fire back in?? Who exactly really WANTS to know that?? But there it is!). I realize now, more than ever, that I only hold these hands for a brief time. That life is wasted on the What If's and Should Have, Could Haves. I life for today. For right now. I feel blessed beyond measure. For my life, my friends, my family, a conversation with a neice, a laugh with my mother, a shared glance with my husband, and the craziness of raising three children. Yes, it's been awhile since I have visited these feelings. And now I will put them back on the shelf. For there are battles to be won as a Jedi and I don't want to miss any of them! Love the Life You Live!!!!!
Thanks so much for taking the time to read this post.
Maybelline Shine Free Oil Control Loose Powder
I just ordered my first My Pink Stamper Stamps!!! I ordered 3 different sets!! I cannot wait to get them!!! If anyone has ordered before, let me know how you like them!!
mystery, to escape
This of course begs the question as to whether there was any anti social drunken behaviour before off trade alcohol was common place. In times when the only place you could get a drink was in a pub, was the country a civilised example of temperance and moderation? I would say not, and point you to the origins of the temperance movement, detailed here. Specifically a quote from temperance campaigner George Sims, the origins of which can be found here,
Now, enjoy some of my personal favorite, and some of the most popular PS22 Chorus videos that helped make the kids an online sensation!
I ask about the tea in Russia and everyone went on about the history, tea houses in the area, and Sergei laughs and brings out a hearty brew suitable for staining hardwood floors accompanied with a lemon slice. The tea was strong, very strong, and very good.
Back in the TARDIS, the Doctor made himself a cup of tea and settled down in a wicker chair. Killing Time Lords was never an easy task; it was disturbing to kill one's own kind and especially those who one had known for many years. Nevertheless, the Watcher had been crazy to think that he could make such a colossal intervention in history. He felt no uneasiness about being given this mission by the Celestial Intervention Agency.
And not one of those definitions, processes, or frameworks fit perfectly with what works best for me and my family. They were inflexible, unfeeling, and missing some critical components that I know from experience work pretty well, such as trust, coaching, and gentle patience. But there they were, guidelines on just how to be a parent who uses Natural Consequences.
So here I am, there you are, we’re both separate, but close. Let’s chat.
Fail her. Because a girl who reads knows that failure always leads up to the climax. Because girls who understand that all things will come to end. That you can always write a sequel. That you can begin again and again and still be the hero. That life is meant to have a villain or two.
When I think of Thanksgiving I think of tables-capes that take on an organic element. A little more rustic I guess you could say. Here are a few of my favorites I have been collecting on Pinterest.
Sunday, Jan. 15, 2012.
PM: 1:07, 2500' ~ Green Mt.
Dude Ranch Nurse
But… an aged and stubborn Gaddafi began thwarting many policies and procedures that were designed to expedite the New World Order-schedule. He was obviously offered several solutions, none of which appealed to him, because he had his own stubborn ways of establishing a United States of Africa!
This is the second gift card holder I've made for Valentine's Day, there's a gift card to a cupcake shop inside the card. This one is for my babysitter. For some reason I'm really on a rosette kick right now.....look for more to come!!
This trend toward greater integration of the media into the market system has been accelerated by the loosening of rules limiting media concentration, cross-ownership, and control by non-media companies. There has also been an abandonment of restrictions-previously quite feeble anyway-on radio-TV commercials, entertainment mayhem programming, and “fairness doctrine” threats, opening the door to the unrestrained commercial use of the airwaves.
“They sure smell good!” I replied, not saying what I really thought, which was something akin to barely cooked pork and trichinosis.
These are the same people who call a delivery van a "logistics solution."
I started to hang out with the iconic South Fla generation X-ers. It was all about LSD, WEED AND MUSIC. For us anyway.
"the one that I was looking for".
Hotels are hotspots that typically require a password and offer free Wi-Fi only to registered guests, thus making hotel Wi-Fi very secure. Neighborhood coffee shops and the public library may not be so secure. You can sometimes check the level of security if there is a terms of service page to read before you connect (a la Starbucks).
mānuṣyam arthadam anityam apīha dhīraḥ
I will strip mine down into something
Melt the butter in a large pot over medium heat. Stir in the onion, celery, corn, chicken and carrots and sauté for 5-7 minutes until vegetables are tender and chicken is cooked through. Add the mushrooms and sauté 3-4 more minutes. Then add flour and stir well. Over medium heat, gradually pour in the chicken broth, stirring constantly. Bring the soup just to a boil and then reduce heat to low and let simmer, while stirring, for 5-6 minutes, until it has thickened slightly.
The L.A.B had a meeting at the M.H today which he sometimes does - on these days, I get up early and put on my 'corporate caterer' hat (it doesn't fit that well...!!) and off I go...(Good job I got lots of experience at the school canteen)...Shopping, chopping, cutting, slicing.....cucumber and cream cheese....
The surrounding image is from Graphics Fairy, I thought it made a great frame for this image. I printed it twice, cutting out the circle on the first to place the image behind and then cut out just the holly and berries to pop up around the bear.
- "On the house"
How do we overcome these problems? I think Ben Bernanke, agree or disagree with his leadership, is taking appropriate steps. Recently, the Federal Reserve has been attempting to educate the public more about the central banking system. It is definitely worth a shot given the popularity of attacking the Fed. I also think it would be very helpful if more emphasis were placed on public education in economics. While in high school, I had one course in economics, and it only lasted for half a semester. The introductory course in college failed to address many issues, and it took place over the course of an entire semester.
We went to the Fashion Outlets in Niagara - didn't see any earth shattering deals, but I did get some nice finds at 40% off at Banana Republic, and picked up a watch I've been eyeing for...ohhh...about a year...
Is it odd that I letterpress print cards but rarely send them out to my own friends and loved ones? I think it has to do with sharing something that's more personal between those that I send mail to, in this case, holiday greetings. Don't get me wrong, I enjoy every moment of printing any and all work for the snap + tumble line. But I usually want to go a step further and make something different for my own personal correspondence.
First, are the wonderful Hexies from Janelle for November! She was worried I wouldn't like them! They are in soft blues, my favorite colour!
But for now, tonight, here we are. I’m typing and I keep typing unless I get interrupted by a technical glitch that just happened. Does anyone have any idea why that happens and how to avoid it? I’m just guessing that my fingers are a little too big for this keyboard.
Should I buy it? Well, I'm certainly for anything that lets me pretend to take a blade to one of those nasty, nudie quilts like the ones Aurora Blankenship is always trying to put in the local quilt shows. She's such a bitch when I do it for real and your dad said next time he wasn't going to post bail.
Marcus made a neat row of eyes on the forehead of his alien.
Capital priorities, which include critical maintenance of properties and the Decade of Science initiative (which focuses on expanding research opportunities in the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics fields), incorporate green standards of development and would create local job opportunities.
to serve you. To desire NO Man!
I know you too are probably abbit mad, but in order to make the contest fair i will need to go back to my old blog to continue off with the contest since some people did not know about this one .I am not going to beg for you to go and do the same because i understand its kind of fustrating now. But if you would still like to be a part of the contest then please do. I'm probably asking for abbit too much.
- very fun, energetic show that brought back some nice memories and was a reminder that jovanotti is an important representative of not only Italian but World music
The Swann Lounge at the Four Seasons is more upscale than you'll usually find for a beer launch, but Rosemarie Certo is doing this to prove a point; the same one that the original Dock Street brewpub proved not 100 yards from there* in the 1990s. Beer is the people's beverage, to be sure, but beer is protean: it can effortlessly go from washing down chicken wings at trestle tables as commentators cry the latest play of the game to pouring luxuriously into ballooned wine glasses as jazz floats above the conversations of the rich and well-dressed. Why not go upscale? Beer is certainly not diminished in its role as social leveler when it becomes 'fancy' or 'extreme,' any more than it is demeaned by going light and getting gulped by the gallon. Beer is all things to all people; or at least, it could be...and that's the point of this.
If more than one event is taking place at your wedding ceremony or wedding reception venue on the day of your wedding, maybe you can share the costs of the wedding decor.
It really does return to choice. You can choose to rid yourself of the fear of failure. You can choose to let go of what is holding you back. Your fear of failure is not innate. You create it. You can uncreate it.
In the kitchen, Mildred gets to work breaking down chickens and goes into a whole monologue about how much she hates how half chickens are served in most places, and how she’s going to serve her half chickens in pieces. See what I mean about unnecessary detail? She flings off some instructions to the waitress as she works, talking a mile a minute.
CF is a chronic genetic illness that causes the body to produce excess thick sticky mucus. This mucus clogs up the digestive system and most people with CF can't digest food, have trouble gaining weight, and have a host of other digestive issues (CF specific diabetes, reflux, feeding tubes, etc etc). The mucus also clogs up the lungs, damaging tissue, making it difficult to breathe, and making a nice cozy home for bacteria to thrive. So along with the digestive issues (which is huge in itself) CF patients also have major lung problems.....many require lung transplants. To battle all this mucus damage CF patients are on TONS of medication and must adhere to a very strict routine for maintaing respiratory health (including more medecine, puffers, nebulizers, shaking vests, chest physiotherapy, and on and on). Fifty years ago most CF children didn't make it past elementary school-- now the median age is 30's (with early diagnosis, medication, and treatment). I am very thankful for all the medecine they have to help treat and manage CF -but unfortunately there is no cure.
Let's hope I don't get near a Depend display anytime soon, or it might be dangerous!
Only SafeWay Driving offers state approved courses, curriculum for driver education classes, and the new offering of an online option. The online courses started by SafeWay Driving are a completely new and innovative approach which was never adopted in the industry before.
With a plethora of polo shirt brands out there in the marketplace a Gentleman should exercise a degree of creative decisiveness and step out of the herd.
Who is “Homeless’ now?
Wiping some of the sweat off her forehead, Schuyler nodded.
Make her bark and beg like a dog
And I met up again with laser-spin-man, for another virtual spinning class led by television screen.
Sugars 0g
Credit Intermediation & Related Activities
Recommended for those interested in very female-centric stories, workplace romances and josei manga; bonus for those who enjoy female leads who show legitimate (though somewhat slow) and believable growth.
Harley Handleman is known as a fighter, an up and coming fighter who will be going all the way. Harley likes what he hears and will stop at nothing to get it. But Harley is never sure how things will turn out as he has had those chances but those cirumstances were out of his control. And contol is something Harley tries to maintain especially in the bedroom but that control will slip with Stasia.
9/25/2008 - Asheville, NC - the Orange Peel
On the subject - Named after the Hertfordshire market town where the brewery was founded in 1992, this firm has been on a quiet march toward market dominance ever since. On this evidence, I'd say it's time to make that march a great deal louder.
Oh, what a crazy girl she is!
Especially if you're a Jayne Mansfield fan.
Not my picture, but I had to show you how seriously cool sailfin blennies are. I wish I had a video of the display.
“She lived and died lonesome and friendless.”
Along the same lines but in a different way you also have examples like Jeremiah and Ezekiel who prayed for God to bless them and God’s blessing overwhelmed and surprised them. There are times that you will want God to come and encounter you but you will surprised by the magnitude by which God blesses in that encounter. God will come at that time you least expect it and will bless you beyond what you could ever imagine!
I am so blessed by the life I lead!
Legacy School Sport CIC was formed in 2011 and is a dedicated ‘not for profit’ social enterprise based at and supported by Spen Valley Sports College. Their aim is to utilise the company’s specialist knowledge to promote, facilitate and enhance sustainable and accessible opportunities for physical activity, sport and lifelong learning. Links to targeted partners are currently helping us to maximise positive impacts on the public health agenda and community well being. In other words concentrate on what we do best.
I think he scared her.
The dish she is holding is her popular 'Puliyum Molakum'. There's no cooking involved in it actually. It's just a combination of some of my favourite things...Tamarind & Coconut Oil.She has been making this for me from the time I can remember. I eat it straight from the bowl but she tells me that I should eat it with some rice or else, it will affect my stomach.
It also mentioned members of the family being part of a community group, Kia Kaha Mangapapa.
Basic Kraft Patterned Paper - Basic Grey
While living in a postage stamp sized apartment in the city, we purchased, and began renovating a beach house two hours away. This was not your typical renovation -- the house had been mostly gutted, and had lost it's view, due to a growing sand dune. We designed and managed an extensive renovation, that included lifting the beach house nine feet!
One does wonder who came off best: the church in Venice or the British taxpayer ?
phantom planet- "dropped"
Occupy’s plans for nationwide May Day chaos are going full-speed ahead, with the movement boasting of “direct action” schemes that include protest marches, shutting down the financial sector, and blocking bridges and tunnels.
the next day sun,
_William Seeley, 39, San Francisco. University of California associate professor and neuropathologist who studies human neurodegenerative disease.
Saute the garlic and onions in olive oil (season with salt and pepper) over medium-low heat until they are translucent and aromatic.
words that amazed the religious people of His day.
1. Paris, the capital of France, is situated on which river?
So the votes are in. The pundits have decided. And the narrative is now taking shape.
Drinks: Party-Berry Punch
And they sinned yet more against him by provoking the most High in the wilderness. And they tempted God in their heart by asking meat for their lust. Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people?
Wherever the snake is at tonight, I almost want to thank it for bringing out New Yorker's humor, even a bit of childlike silliness. We desperately needed it. HISSSSSSSSS!
This weekend, after two previous weekends of consecutive 20 mile runs, I'm running 16 miles on Saturday. It may not sound like alot less, but those extra four miles are tough on the body, and cutting the time of a long run by half an hour is significant. I'm looking forward to having a solid run! The weather for the weekend is dipping by about 10 degrees, which is perfect marathon training weather (low 60s). Part of the reason why I love fall marathons so much is that the bulk of the heavy miles comes when the temperature starts to change, along with the foliage, which makes for a gorgeous run!
Some of the driving courses are also offered online that allows you to learn at your own pace. This was proven to be very effective in helping you to become familiar with the rules of the road. If in any case the course that you have chosen was not approved by the government you may call the local DMV to clarify if the course is acceptable for a learner’s permit application and driver’s license. Normally the classroom discussions in a driving education will be conducted by a qualified professional instructor. Most often the state may require driving schools to post their driving instructor’s certification so that students will know about their background and experience in the field. If your state does not require a driving school to do so you can simply ask for the instructor’s credentials or any proof that would support his legibility.
Beat the eggs until they are pale and fluffy. Tap the bowl of sugar on the side of the mixing bowl so they are added little by little. Add in the coffee and cocoa powder mixture, mix well. Add in the flour mixture and switch to a hand whisk.
People usually turn to books about failure, despair, and poverty hoping to find at least some section involving substance abuse. If that’s what you’re looking for you should stop right here. I never had the time or the money to get really into drugs or alcohol.
I'm so glad too, because it was pretty rough going their for a year when the girls didn't get along.
Fashion mistakes are plentiful, but what is it that most people do to create these fashion fax paus? What is it that is 'fashionable' on one person and a horrible mistake on another?
Because one never really knows why
as if by instinct
Does it mean anything to you?"
Because when I hear your voice
So today, I am thankful for organization!
I have found a few blogs that are doing this or have done this. They have great ideas and make the process seem much easier! I’m an Organization Junkie did a 52 Weeks of Organization series in 2011. Brighton Park is doing a series called Get Organized in 2012. I’m excited to start this journey!
- Realer than you know, Danny – said Lady Gaga.
I want to finish my novel, but every day a peek at the news goes straight to my inner core with an admonition: ‘Tis no time for vainglorious pursuits; you must give witness, you must protest, though it’s not you who will bear the brunt of the destruction. So I sit down to one of my usual polemics, but then the life of an exile intervenes, and I have to do what life maintenance requires, and the writing has to go into a drawer.
I think I shy away from watching really good dramas again and again because they take me on emotional roller coasters and creep my soul into tight emotional spaces that I don’t always want to visit, but then again that’s not always true. I’ve watched that climax scene from Notes on a Scandal like a 100 times. I can almost recite it. “Did you think we would roll around on the floor like lovers? Christ, did you think you were Virgina Fuckin’ Wolf?!!” Something like that and then Cate Blanchett slams little, old, lady, Dame Judi Dench up against the built-in wall cabinet! It’s white knuckle-ingly GOOOOOD stuff. Also, I read somewhere that Judy Dench wore a Mutant Ninja Turtles pillow taped to her back for the wall slam moment and something about that just makes me smile. In my sick, comedic, mind I’d like to re-do that entire scene starring two drag queens. I don’t know why, there’s something about the drama of it that just seems fitting.
We chant the names of the Devi and sing her songs. Since I now know the Sri Suktham with Vedic Swaras , I chanted that to please Her, the Divine Mother, the Light in us and outside us.
This week's episode takes place in an abandoned copper mine! And I've dug up some old recipes that are sure to please along with the show.
It wasn’t that lola didn’t want mama to know where we were, but she just didn’t realize that, logically, it was necessary to tell my mom that we had a new address. Sometimes lola is just like that. It’s weird.
Habima, Israel's national theatre company, is due to perform at the World Shakespeare Festival at London's famous Globe Theatre. Theatre troupes from every corner of the earth will be there, including from the new nation of South Sudan (whose actors will perform Cymbeline in Juba Arabic) and from New Zealand (in the first Maori-language performance of Troilus and Cressida). Some authoritarian states are involved, too, including China and Zimbabwe.
Overall it was a great race for me. Not only was it another personal best, but I loved being involved in so many aspects of it and I love that other people were too.
The shocks. This piece-bright paling shuts the spouse
12. Love is Dangerous
You don’t have to pay a publisher or agent. ( you shouldn’t ever give them money but you will be paying them when they take a percentage of your sales. Cutting out the agents and publisher’s high over head.
Pasta with tomato sauce, broccoli/spinach salad, garlic bread
“The reason so many people in A.A. give thanks that they are alcoholics is that the problem of living, and the failure to meet life successfully, is singled down for them to the problem of alcohol. It is definite and specific. This is exactly what Christianity has taught from the beginning, not only about a problem like alcoholism, but about the whole range of human defeat: that the old clichés like ‘exerting more will power’ are utterly impractical. We are just as powerless by ourselves over temper, or a bad tongue, or a moody disposition, or a habit of lust, or a hard and critical spirit. It is only pride and lack of insight into ourselves that would keep anyone from saying, ‘our lives have become unmanageable.’ This is the first step, not only towards sobriety, but towards self-understanding and the knowledge of life.” Bill Pittman and Dick B., Courage to Change: The Christian Roots of the Twelve-Step Movement, pages 208-09.
The most critical thing to in any kind of narrative or with a transition between scenes is to remember that every word and revelation has to count. Everything we include needs to be new and critical information for the reader either on an emotional or informational level. Ideally, it should multi-task the same way that great dialogue often reveals emotion, character, and information to propel the story forward. That's hard for us to guage of course, and for me, I know it's one of my hardest tasks as a writer to guage where I've added too much. Narrative can be a writer's quicksand. To avoid lulling the reader out of the story, we need to make sure that our narrative is never plain vanilla. We invoke strong images and precise verbs to make it count and make it compelling, and that leads to the risk of writerly indulgence. Narrative is most often where we fall in love with our words. Hopefully, our transitions are smooth enough that we take the reader along for the ride until we get right back into the next, necessary, scene.
Chrysalis offers a chance for new life. A chance to leave the life of a caterpillar behind.. and to start anew.. to start fresh as a butterfly. These girls on this weekend did just that. They left their burdens behind.. and claimed new life in Christ. Each one of them left with a spiritual high desiring to change their ways from that day forward.
Want to meet George Clooney and Barack Obama -- at Clooney's house?
732 **D-VII/19/1976. “Founding and Refounding: Inaugural Addresses of the Presidents of the United States.” Conference of the United States Constitution and the American Character, Ohio University, Athens, Ohio. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(10), above, pp. 188-211.)
I could stay awake
This time we had a fresh Breton goats' cheese, with a green salad (washed in salt water and spun - you could see the earth and insects left behind!) and a few lovely tomatoes. Lunch is ready!
The culture of an organization starts with the leadership. Make an effort to give regularly – you will love the results and can be the leader to change the culture of your organization. How about we all embrace a culture of kindness?
"The minister of police must explain why this state of affairs has been allowed to continue, and what steps he plans to take to curb the SAPS' repeated failure to meet its debts," Kohler-Barnard said.
Campaign finance reform advocates have banded together to push for changes in political funding in Albany this year, and have hired Jennifer Cunningham and SKD Knickerbocker to hone a media relations strategy. The coalition, which includes the Working Families Party, Citizens Union, Common Cause New York and others, is working with the governor’s special counsel on public integrity and ethics issues, Jeremy Creelan, to push for changes. Their agenda includes a New York City-style public financing system, an end to loopholes and large
Sarah Rainone (Love Will Tear Us Apart)
Hmm, a lot of love story examples this time, for a change! May be the influence of some wedding that took place recently…
If I had ever used a lazy-ass short form when I was a boy my old dad would have abbreviated my backside with a copy of Mr. Webster’s dictionary.
04. Wearing The Inside Out
Having the confidence to approach and ask is more than half the battle. I have yet to meet an HNG (and I’ve met a lot of them) that isn’t a sweetheart. If an HNG catches your eye at a convention or your local comic book store and you don’t see a ring on her finger, go for it. If she’s taken chances are she’ll let you down nicely. If she’s not nice about it then consider yourself lucky that she’s saving you the trouble of having to deal with a mean girl. Same thing goes for the ladies. Nasty people aren’t worth your time or energy.
It's been a long time since I have written my journaling in a color besides black. This time I decided to try using the blue journaling pen included in the kit and I loved the result! The story is there, but it almost fades into the design, allowing the photos to really shine on their own.
Thursday: Move to Omaha (to start my job on Monday!)
A couple things about the recipe:
I awoke the following morning craving Jack’s kind and gentle touch. My conundrum had already been revisited. That afternoon I went to a screening of the classic film noir “The Third Man”, starring Orson Welles and Joseph Cotton. At 1pm the lights inside the Castro Theatre dimmed. A single spotlight illuminated a miked lectern, stage left. Out of the darkness, a mustached man in his late sixties walked up to the lectern. A SF Film Festival staff badge dangled from his neck. He went on to somberly dedicate the screening to the late, deceased director of the SF Film Society. He articulated the director’s boisterous, opinionated personality, passion for film programming, and the profound impact he had in his short ten week tenure as director. Although I knew neither the speaker, nor the one he spoke about, I found the speech to be quite moving. Once the brief dedication concluded, the spotlight faded and the 16mm reels began to spin.
Local breweries and restaurants will also post a copy of the Declaration of Beer Independence so that patrons can show their support.
This picture doesn't do it justice. Snow covered trees! Something that I love the see in December - not so much in February!
I simply remove individually frozen boneless, skinless chicken breasts from the freezer, dip them in egg then in a mixture of seasoned bread crumbs and Parmesan cheese. Then, I place them on a baking sheet and bake at 375 degrees for 45 minutes to an hour, until cooked through. I warm a frozen vegetable in the microwave while I cook up a box of Pasta-Roni (which my kids inhale) on the stove. If I do not have Pasta-Roni on hand, I sometimes boil some pasta noodles then toss them with butter and Parmesan cheese.
So to get back to the anger and bulimia issue, after being forced to make myself fat I was furious and too scared to lose much weight in case I got sent back to the clinic (scarily enough, it’s supposed to be one of the best in the world). So I took laxatives for about a year – starting at 20 a go, and building up to 180. The pain from that made me vomit – but hey, free purging I guess! Then I started seriously binging and purging a year and a half ago. I don’t feel angry when I do it. I just feel numb and it’s nice. But I still hate it.
But of course in Snee, ‘Hello’ means something quite rude. So, you keep reading, I’ll keep running. Deal? Waaah!"
I just can’t stop messing my mind up
He came back a month later and proposed to me with a beautiful ring, I agreed.
Many commentators have stressed the militarist nature of Sikhism. Sikhs would not disagree with this. Thus these commentators also stress this as a similarity with Islam, which seems fair. But the nature of Sikh’s warlike spirit must be understood historically. And that history brings in Muslims and Islam.
I also noticed that there is now a very large (and fine) Christmas tree in the square. There will be lights, I am told. This was another reason to celebrate.
In Vancouver there is an amazing shop on Granville Island called Maiwa. I discovered it last summer when we were there, so made a bee-line there once again. Twice in fact. It would have been more, only the family already knew what I was up to! The supply store is a treasure trove, filled with all sorts of goodness to get the textile creative juices flowing; be it knitting, crochet, felting, sewing, painting, natural dyeing or printing. It was the latter two that had me transfixed mostly and I thought it may be of interest to you, too.
2. Light Static Stretching 3 x 10 s hammies, quad hip flexor
Ostracized and considered unclean, she had been depleted of everything – physically, financially, relationally, and probably emotionally. But her faith remained intact, for she held onto the Scriptures. She clung to it, knowing this was her chance to touch the Man of God Who healed.
We weren't the only ones. My best friend is a bisexual woman with a same-sex partner; L'Ailee's best friend is a bisexual man with a same-sex partner. Both couples eventually took quick day trips to Massachusetts, as we had for our second wedding, to get married. Both couples returned to New York before the ink dried on their marriage licenses. The six of us jokingly referred to Massachusetts as "Mass Vegas." After all, for us, it was a quick place to get married, as Las Vegas is for some people in mixed-sex relationships. Unlike the stereotypical Las Vegas couple, however, we put much thought into our marriages and had known our partners for a long time.
I had to think about this one-- and I didn't get it until I sat thinking about the Japanese word for 'racoon' and how it's exactly the same as the German word (English is the odd one out;-).
Here is a screen shot of my action at work. Very helpful.
In assessing whether government has burdened freedom of religion, a person’s or a religious organization’s right to act in a manner motivated by a sincerely held religious belief is the ability to engage in religious practices in the privacy of a person’s home or in the privacy of a religious organization’s established place of worship.
Over and over again I hear things like "she's just a sub" or "that happened because there was a sub." And it just irks me. I enter the teacher's lounge in some schools and subs are relegated to the other end of the table. We are not talked to at recess unless we force the issue. It really does feel like a form of segregation.
Higher rents and lower sale prices mean that, in many areas, renting costs just as much or more than buying or owning a home. Real estate website Trulia’s recent Rent vs. Buy Index found this to be the case in 98 percent of America’s 20 largest cities, taking into consideration both the added expenses and tax advantages of owning vs. buying (the exceptions were areas like San Francisco and Manhattan, the markets that were the most recession-resistant).
Taunt me
This pattern is an adapted version of shawl 7b in Beehive Knitting Booklets No. 9, A Practical Guide to Knitting and Crochet c. 1915. It has been tweaked to no longer be a full circle and written more simply.
I asked how he was with other forms of language: words and numbers. "I'm good with words and I love numbers. I can be quite physically clumsy though."
So is Twitter for you? I don't know, try it and see! Tip: I know you need to follow and be followed by some critical number of people (not sure how many) before things get interesting and you don't feel like you are tweeting to an empty room so don't give up right away. And if you follow me, say hi by using an "at reply" (@madeinlowell) so I can get to know who you are. Sometimes I can't keep up with new followers and people get unintentionally lost in the crowd.
Good Monday morning everyone. I hope everyone had a wonderful weekend. This week over at the JustRite Stampers blog, they are having sneak peaks at their new releases coming out January 20. These new stamp sets are beautiful. The florals just make me wish for Spring even more!!!
But 25(4) says that “The public interest includes the nation’s commitment to land reform, and to reforms to bring about equitable access to all South Africa’s natural resources; and (6) property is not limited to land.
Edit : Add up more pictures below. At the end is a Youtube video, courtesy of jamcansing. Excellent quality. Feeling so nostalgic .
People often tell me that when they apply too much ink during the blending process the ink starts to feather out beyond the stamped line. The first question I ask them is, "What paper are you using?"
A neighbour, Michael Plimmer, who has lived in Derby Road for 21 years, spoke at a previous council meeting, arguing that the site was on an ‘exposed’ plot of land, and said he believed that if it got any bigger it could cause ‘a bad first impression’ for anyone driving into the village.
With perfect weather year round.
"Put the drill in reverse to get it unstuck from my tongue"
PC or Mac?
Yeah, I could just see him like it was yesterday, his truck parked on Avenue C between East 3rd and East 4th, long tall and lean standing there like a gentle giant. Waiting for us hand him our dimes and quarters after another day at PS 179.
I have to admit, when I first saw the photos she sent, I was already kind of in love with her room. There is something very eclectic and relaxed that I really like about her style.
Had a quiet weekend just gone - it was nice to not go anywhere or entertain and just relax at home :) been a busy few months lately and fingers crossed another busy few ahead work wise!!!!!!!! Just waiting on an email or two with those - very impatiently too I might add!!!!!!
Alan D. Feinberg, 48, New York, N.Y.
So … I’m looking at this page and thinking, What’s the trick? I know I’m an idiot, but really.
On Dec 24th, I e-mailed the main advocate on the adoption forum asking if there was anything I could do to help this family.
I found this book very interesting, though not an easy read. It is one of those books that are best read a chapter at the time to let the vast amount of high vibrational information sink in slowly.
So there's my review. I've tried my best to be absolutely honest however as you probably know if you follow either my blog or the Lime Crime drama i really hate this company. The colours are pretty and I would wear every one of them, while they certainly aren't unique some of them are definately hard to find and wouldn't be found in many drugstore brands. However the formula is awful and i personally am not pleased with it at the price we paid, let alone the £14 you will pay for them instore. You can get at least a similar shade to every one of the colours elsewhere if you know where to look and in general you will get a much better formula for a cheaper price.
Several people I work with all drive civics and every time I see them pull in or I spot their car parked in the parking lot, I get a little nostalgic. I remember the feeling of my first NEW car.
It is very important to try and honor at least some of your dreams along the way. From the moment that you lose your health, it is too late. Health brings a freedom very few realize until they no longer have it.
250 gram mascarpone cheese
I discovered that the Picasso poster was worth in the area of $600. Of course the connection I had to it was priceless and I chose to frame it and display it in our home.
“John Green is amazing. But don’t listen to The Fault in Our Stars while your driving. You’ll cry so hard that you’ll get into an accident.”
are sleeping through the night
So now, our apartment is starting to echo, Jeff and I are still getting our things together for when we move on the 28th. We’ve got our couch posted on Craig’s List for sale, and people keep telling me that they want it and then backing out.. so my sectional is in 3 pieces, I’ve cleaned and deoderized it, I keep shooing the cats away from it… only to curl up on it to watch TV after the buyer no-call/no-shows. It’s very frustrating!
Hydi made two almost equal pillow covers in her lovely African fabric.
"If the applicant's grandparents were not married to each other before April 17, 1985 and the parent of the applicant was born after April 17, 1985, the 2011 Indian Act amendments may not entitle the applicant to registration."
I have been detoxing for years and I’m nearly addicted to that feeling of being rejuvenated and revitalised that invariably follows a detox. For the price of a few weeks of headaches, nausea and other detox symptoms, you end up getting a new lease on life and energy enough to climb mountains. The difference this time is the model for the detox that I found through Karyn Calabrese’s youtube clips (check out KarynRaw) and two-hour free seminar. Basically, what she advocates is a form of detox in which you don’t fast until the third week and only for three days if you’re new to fasting. The programme is built around removing, replacing and rebalancing and it is as much a physical as a spiritual journey.
* important biblical characters
Thanks for stopping by and having a look. Hope you like it.
it's alright as it is now and bonzo isn't filing any complaints but i've got a few items on my wishlist to make it a fun place where we'll be happy to spend our summer.
Gerald’s mouth dropped. He stared. He definitely knew that voice…it wasn’t just familiar…
But I almost want to just look at all of this and just say “I’m new to this, I’m young, this isn’t fair”
We had a great response - 22 participants who made 11 busy bags each. Everyone did an amazing job. You can read the original post to find out all about the Busy Bag Swap. If you like the sound of it leave a comment as we're looking for expressions of interest to do another one in the near future. It would seem some of our participants would like to do it all over again too!
Note: The above discussion is based on descriptions contained in the Penguin Dictionary of Architecture (Fourth Edition).
1. Put the water and flour into a pan and let simmer over very low heat while stirring with beater. Continue until the mixture turns into a kind of runny gluey consistency. Remove from heat. This is the base for seasoning.
As for being a little guy, I think his 4 month check up was after I posted about him turning 4 months, so I probably didn't post his stats. He was only in the 3rd percentile for weight! If you adjust for age (since he should be a month younger) he is 15%, but either way, this guy's little. I am curious to see what his 6 month checkup shows.
The television news is full of doom and gloom and it is true that around the world there are many people suffering war, famine or other natural or man-made disasters. Whilst I do not suggest you should not care and do nothing, remember that there are many beautiful positive things happening too. Don’t wrap yourself up with all the negative aspects around the world. Learn to look for beauty too for, in building self esteem, we must learn how to be positive in a negative world.
7 Pounds Pork Rib
You’ve probably already heard about Caine, but in case you haven’t he’s the 9 year old boy from East Los Angeles who made a functioning arcade out of cardboard shipping boxes, packaging tape, dime store calculators, and some old personal toys for prizes, inside his dad’s used auto parts store.
“I will not call them back, sweetheart. You can give me the credit card number or you can give them a call yourself, see if you have better luck,” I said with a cheshire grin forming at the edge of my lips.
I entered the Amazon Breakthrough Novel Awards again. Fifth time's a charm, right? As with last year, I made it past the dreaded Pitch Stage, and am now in the dreaded Excerpt Stage.
"And now that you've noticed that button, don't you...want to push it? I mean, there it is, all red and shiny...."
Also during the bottom of the fourth, Ryan Holland hit his third double of the season, staying back at second base to play it safe. Korey Wacker stepped up next and drilled one into left-center field to drive Holland home to give the Terps a 1-0 lead.
Transition is almost complete and it will be good..
By 1630 Galileo had finished a book that contained all his thoughts on science. His feelings were that the forces in the sky were the same as those on Earth and by performing mechanical experiments on Earth, we can learn about the stars. He found it very difficult to publish the book but by 1632 it was in print in Florence where it was an instant success. Almost immediately Rome attempted to stop the presses and buy back the books which had by then sold out. The Pope was furious at how the book came to be published at all and Galileo, now in his seventieth year, was summoned to Rome to answer for it.
Curry powder to taste -- I use 1 T mild curry powder when making it for people who don’t like spicy stuff (aka children), 2-3 for the more adventurous eaters (aka certain adults)
Most Victorian households conveniently forgot the latter part of this tradition!
The trouble is, I now crave that feeling with a LARGER group of kids than those that take art class in middle or high school.
4) I don't have any concrete ideas for the last project yet, but I just bought this fabric off Etsy:
I did get two cards made...one for the Inspirational challenge on the Crafters Re-United forum and another just so that I could try out 2 new goodies.
The first thing I saw in the trunk as I wiped the muddy sweat from my eyes was an old well loved teddy bear with a new purple button eye. It was wrapped in the mummified arms of a small boy dressed in the same clothing I had seen on Teddy that first day of my Autumn knitting afternoons. It seems my late Uncle Theodor was finally found.
5. Join me in therefore gaining the holiday 15 - or the marriage 15. Oh dear.
“Our lives begin to end the day we become silent about things that matter.” –Martin Luther King, Jr.
These are Roldan figures--fun Spanish touristy souvenirs. Roldan and Klumpe dolls have a very specific and stylized look. They are made of cloth and felt, and were produced in Barcelona, Spain from the 1950s to early 1970s.
My lunch is shown on the right, it consisted of
Nic's Said Books:
Garnish with coriander and serve hot or at room temperature.
there's less daydreaming there, less words. I think I'm quite done with that.
Basically what this theory is saying is that anything that can happen does happen, we only view one of the events happening. If I flip a coin there are three main probabilities that can occur: the can lands tails up, heads up, or on it's side. The probability of landing on it's side isn't likely but is included to understand this. Let's say you have a 48% chance of a tails, 48% of heads, and 2% chance of it landing on the side (I know that's not right). So when you flip a coin you could say your line of time gets separated into 100 other lines, 48 in which the coin lands heads up, 48 tails, and 2 on the side. So rather than 1 coin flip equaling one result, as occurring in an arrow line of time (as opposed to a branching tunnel view of time), 1 coin flip would yield 100 results, only one of which we see. This means that at every possible instant there are alternate lines of time branching off. As I sit here deciding what my next point should be, there is already a parallel Michael who has created that sentence, and from that Michael other numerous Michaels, maybe one who deleted the sentence.
Seven days take my worries
When asked what was the use of a new invention,
Make no mistakes about it when electoral fraud happens something also happens in the spiritual realms. St. Paul reminds us: “For we do not wrestle against flesh and blood, but against the rulers, against the authorities, against the cosmic powers over this present darkness, against the spiritual forces of evil in the heavenly places.”
The article in circulation on Sampradaya Sun and Indiadivine.org., are not authorized by me. Such errors as are contained in them due to addition, omission or any other cause are the karma of those reproducing the article. I have communicated to both organisations to “at least” link to the original updated article, so that people will have at least as much truth as I have discovered, and I have no response from them so far. Only Sri Krishna can help us of they decide to print!!
Also over the break, I realized I forgot a VERY important item on my best of 2011 list: going to the New Kids on the Block/ Backstreet Boys concert with my sisters! That was one of the best things I did all of last year. We danced, we sang along, we screamed till we lost our voices. And most importantly, I saw Jordan Knight for the second time in my life. Remember this?
Jazz music is made.
and ALWAYS on the web at
Holiday- Halloween
Jacuzzis and whirlpools are other luxuries that can be a hit or a miss for sellers. A young couple may love the additions; a family with small children may see them as a waste of space and potential hazard.
A businessman of Alexandria, a rural town in the Eastern Cape province of South Africa, has launched a unique Ten Commandments Campaign. He and his family are planting Commandments every 200 metres along the road leading from their town for starters.
Keeping my dark shameful secret to myself, I had hoped that the hair had been some genetical fluke that wouldn’t repeat itself, but in a cruel twist of fate, that stupid hair made its stubby little appearance again within the next few days. It was official. I was some kind of freak show now, ready to join a circus and set up a tent so all the normal people in the world could come gross themselves out looking at the one hair on my chin.
I can’t say much more about this, but the 1985 film I like much more. See also that entry, rating 5 with 2 boys in bibs.
However, I may never get to find him. Nobody knows the name of the girl my sperm donor knocked up when they were only 15.
Dougherty plays with British folklore and also borrows from Greek or European myth as the notion takes him. The invitation to the reader to join in the fun is irresistible. Druids rub shoulders with dwarves and selkies, and Doughtery uses the comic potential inherent in certain types of Good People to the full. But the veil of humour regularly lifts to show the darkness behind the myths. Death and destruction lie in wait for the unwary, and the scene where Bansi is chased by a Bruid, the headless man from European myth, is simply terrifying.
Britain’s Got Talent and The X Factor are made by people who understand popular culture. Increasingly, though, TV entertainment shows are made by people who don’t; they are made by people with superiority complexes and a contempt for their audiences.
CTS
1 tablespoon grated orange peel
So be warned: if you're worried about spoiling the ending of London After Midnight (which you can't see anyhow) or Mark of the Vampire (which you can), proceed at your own risk.
No, mothers baked their finest to show off their culinary skills. There would be pies galore. Ms. Elta’s three layer German Chocolate Cake was a legendary standard, much-anticipated each year. There would always be at least one large coconut cake with seven-minute frosting (no canned frosting!). If there were cookies or brownies, they were definitely homemade and piled high, as befits a prize.
One who fears technology (or new technology, as they seem pleased with how things currently are... why can't everything just be the same?) (Urban dictionary)
Dwyer reportedly started this group as a vehicle to "to release his instrumental, experimental home recordings." (That's in Wikipedia, so it must be true.) Although there's still a lot of lo-fi experimental noise here and sprawling instrumental jams, Carrion Crawler/The Dream is the work of a full-fledged band.
 Still easier and better access to more and more government subsidies such as welfare, health care, unemployment compensation, etc.
Sallmén M, Liesivuori J, Taskinen H, Lindbohm M-L, Anttila A, Alto Aalto L, Hemminki K. Time to pregancy among the wives of Finnish greenhouse workers. Scand J Work Environ Health 2003; 29: 85-93.
At Costco, or another food club, you can purchase the same amazing Greek feta cheese...not the pre-crumbled kind, but in one solid block, which stays moist, and you can dice it, or crumble it yourself. For a 2.65lb. of Greek Feta Cheese, I paid a little over $10. ...prepared 3 different kinds of dishes with it, and I still have enough to use for a beautiful Greek salad. So actually, you have enough for 4 different kinds of things to use it in...which is about $2.50 pr each dish, that serves up to 6 to 8 servings. What a fabulous DEAL!
"It's not just a gun-owner, but a GUN-LOVER. . ."
Loeb’s lead isn’t a comfortable one as he’s just one-tenth of a second clear of team-mate Hirvonen… “The start of the stage was not good at all but the rest was good, very tight. Dani is not very far so I hope we can have a little fight. ”
8: aqualung 8:04
Eole Water said their priorities in the design were maximum water production, energy independence, low maintenance, logistical flexibility and no environmental impact.
Hail to He Who Is Bull and Bull’s Slayer–Rejoice! You are praised!
Sunday Chris and I drove to my parents to pick up the wee one. I'm happy to report that everyone survived Ryann's first night away from me. I think she missed us, and Grammy and Papa were exhausted, but we survived :o). We were going to let Ryann nap there, and then drive home, but she just wasn't falling asleep. So we hopped in the car thinking she would crash. No dice. She was a spaz in the back for the majority of the trip. I tried to blog anyway while we drove. Of course shortly before we made it to town it got rather quiet in the backseat. I turned around to see some mean looking sleepy eyes. Sure enough, she passed out about 15 minutes from our house. We decided to go with it, and ran a couple errands to let her nap a bit.
The Kink's version, in my book is the superior version. Ray's vocals are almost ambivalent, with an almost jealous -but-couldn't-care-less attitude to them as he writes and sings in one of his best modes: social observation. Pete Quaife's bass and Nicky Hopkin's slight piano chords rock it out in an almost "Sunny Afternoon" style descending chord progression and it ends with Ray (finally) singing with a sad bit of jealous resignation "and Dandy, you're alright...".
Your top hats sleek and tall,
As doers for Jesus, we are called to do many things for him. We are called to encourage others, give to those in need, show hospitality, pursue peace with all people, love our enemies, submit to the governing authorities, and be good stewards of the resources we’ve been given. Those are all good things that we must do in order to obey the Lord Jesus in this life, but consider this quote by Greg Gilbert from his book, What is the Gospel?
As some of you know, it has been a dream of mine to one day graduate from college. My path to this dream hasn’t been easy and it’s taken longer than I imagined, yet I feel so proud of how far I’ve come and how close I am. I found out a week ago that I just need 7 more classes to get my Sociology degree and words can’t explain how excited I felt to hear that. Well, when I read Kathy’s post about her courage to apply for a scholarship I thought to myself, I should do this too, and look into what’s available out there. I’ve never qualified for financial aid and throughout the years I have paid for each and every class on my own, and now that I’ve gone from working full time to part time and having a baby I’ve been thinking more and more of how to continue to make my dream happen financially. And then wouldn’t you know it, the next day I get an email in my inbox from CSULB, an opportunity for Junior/Senior Sociology majors to apply for the Dick Soderland “Against All Odds” Scholarship. No joke. My jaw just about dropped. I immediately thought, oh my gosh…I can do this…I should do this…wait this is scary…what if I don’t get…Stop. As long as I follow God’s path, he will work in amazing ways.
May 7, 1966: Released by the California Angels.
Carpaccio, Cornish duck. Lucky I have money to roll in for forming luxury. Tips?
There are few things I love to eat more than a good burrito. When I went to Las Vegas, one of the must-dos on my list was to go to a Chipotle (there are none around here) and it was one of the highlights of my trip. Giving up my weekly soft flour tortilla or a crunchy corn one was one of the saddest moments when starting this diet. Last night, I was desperate for some Tex-Mex and finally tried what I thought would be a disappointing exercise – using romaine lettuce as a way to wrap up tasty toppings.
Hubby: Very funny. Just finish answering the questions.
80. Eat 6 fruits/veggies a day
There's a pair of Newark players you should keep in mind. Tim Raines Jr. and Todd Gossage, the offspring of two former MLB greats, will be playing for the Bears this season. Todd will be twenty-seven years old this season. Tim Raines Jr. will be thirty-two in August.
This is what the Church has always believed.
and MAYBE 8. paint again (if we think it needs it)
As the fissures in the old compact widened, elites lost faith in the process of working together in relative disinterest for the good of all, and America began to resemble something more like the Hobbesian state of nature, with the war of all against all. Here's how Packer describes the oil-shock era and the subsequent end of a relatively disinterested establishment:
and they were all before he could get to a window on his own.
Seeing a typed list of which clothes to wear in the morning is not the same as looking at them hanging in the wardrobe.
oils
2. Woher beziehst du dein Einkommen?
That black and white tile is just insane. It's also a bit MC Escher, don't you think? (And for the young ones, despite the name, he's actually not a rapper from the 90's).
I do recall the devilry
1) Jesus died due to the rigors of crucifixion;
No, I'm not. The truth is, when you send your kids to school this is what it looks like even in families that get along well. In many families, it is far, far worse. I have worked with these kids before, I've seen it in action. Sometimes parents run their families like this in a misguided attempt to keep a complex system running smoothly. Sometimes they do it because they don't know any better. And sometimes, they do it because they like to be controlling and abusive, sadly.
I actually really like the potential of the love triangle in this series, which is surprising! This is one of the love triangles that is done right. Both guys are good for Violet, but in different ways. They both attract different sides of her character and I love it. And if you're worrying about Violet cheating on Jay then don't! Violet isn't like that.
I suffered through the derision and mockery for several more mornings until I realized it was curbside garbage pickup day and I was about to say goodbye to my old yellow bag forever. Early that morning, while it was still dark, I rummaged through the rollout bin and rescued the old bag. I haven’t begun to use it again; it’s just nice to know it’s stashed safely in my underwear drawer should I ever decide to return to a simpler time.
150g button mushrooms
I decided to mix it up a bit I did traditional salads, potato and green and also a couple new things– a tomato basil and cheese salad and an asiago and artichoke dip with baked pita chips.
Arthur Christmas
dthanja
* university lectures are subject to copyright protection even though they are not explicitly listed in the definition of "literary work" in the Israeli Copyright Law.
It is clear that we need to forgive in order to be forgiven. It is important to understand that we cannot even have effective prayer if we do not release the burden of unforgiveness first. It is like forgiving provides a freedom in our lives. All of us have gone through periods that we were carrying un-forgiveness. I think that all of us realized that it was heavy on us to be in that status. And when we gave forgiveness, even when we were right, we felt lighter. Isn’t it?
We didn't have much time
I am currently 42 & 3/4 years old.
Connecting with all the waves may bring the miraculous into being.
Miz Witherspoon also owns an almost 6,500 square foot faux-French Provincial residence in Nashville, TN (above, top) where she spent her childhood and where, as fer as we know, her parents still live. She also maintains a stunning 7-acre ranch in Ojai, CA (above, bottom)—bought from Million Dollar Decorator Kathryn Irelend in March 2008 for $5,800,000—where she and Mister Toth were married last year in an intimate ceremony attended by a considerable cadre of celebrities.
Summary: God tells Noah of His covenant to not destroy all life every again (at least by flood), and creates a rainbow to be the sign for this promise. Some time later, Noah is drunk and naked in his tent. Ham, the youngest son, walked in on him and saw him naked and went and told his brothers. His brothers walked backwards into Noah’s tent and covered him up. When Noah awoke, he figured out what happened and cursed Ham’s son, Canaan. Noah dies at the age of 950.
my friend's wife were standing right there, I swapped out my usual
“Yes!” the four year old cheered.
5) Omit needless words and phrases that add nothing to the meaning of a sentence
Oh, and how am I doing you might ask? Ahh, just fine. And yes, I am still unemployed but am one happy camper!!
Hunh. Who knew?
What a relief to hear Mohammed Shafiq, chief executive of the Ramadhan Foundation, a moderate Muslim youth group, accusing Pakistani community elders of “burying their heads in the sand” over this poisonous problem. He welcomes police intervention and insists that race is “central to the actions” of the criminals. “They think that white teenage girls are worthless and can be abused without a second thought; it is this sort of behaviour that is bringing shame on our community.”
It wasn't always easy either so I just waited for the right time to share.
Call me when you have the time for that.
Safe in the newness of
About a week later, I promised to remake the ragu that we’d shared at dinner. With 13 of us, there was really only enough for everyone to have one bite–it was so delicious that we all wished we each could have our own plate of the ragu.
“As government expands, religious liberty is reduced to a special “exemption” and concerns about government coercion are dismissed, in the memorable words of Nancy Pelosi, as “this conscience thing.” “
logistics. The MI-6 agent in the white sports car had
Please pantomime --- a way to show compassion to someone in your family.
Means: "I can't hear the game over the vacuum cleaner."
Chalk one up as another great 'start an ice cream shop life adventure/journey' moment. Made even sweeter by being able to share it with the many friends and customers who are the reason my little ice cream shop adventure is still here and still growing after almost 9 years.
Respects creative expression
- November 29, 2001 dies at a friend’s home in Beverly Hills, California
She stumbled while learning her own power;
The round tower is also 10th century and it isn't my photograph that isn't quite straight - the tower actually leans two feet from the vertical! It served as a belfry, a treasure house, a watch tower and a place of refuge for the monks from Viking and other raiders.
My Boyfriend: "What's the weather like up there?"
the chances of it all happening once were so very low that i can't see how the universe would bring it on again but tonight i saw quite a coincidence so it would probably wise if i never thought of it all again.
Okay, so the mail fairy came yesterday, right?? So I'm like..WHAT UP YO!? That ho came again....and only one week later!?!? How cool is that!?
somewhere that loves us.
I got an iPhone, y'all.
Runtime: 120 Minutes
(And I needed to leave for soccer practice pretty much right away)
Fruitcakes need time to mature. Usually six weeks maturing is needed if you want to get the most flavor into them. I asked for the recipe a.s.a.p to get the preparations going. The recipe handed to me was incomplete, but delightful to read through. On the recipe there were minimal instructions. The bonus’ were the notations. Grandma M. kept track of when the cakes were made and for whom. Here is a sampling:
Scenes like Joffrey with his name day present from Tyrion are exactly why watching HBO program is not for the faint of heart, and it’s directly responsible for why two of my friends refuse to watch any of their programming. Thankfully, I’m made of sterner stuff although I was glad to be spared the sight of the whore with her head caved in. Again though, if HBO has a failing, it is their insistence on shoving in our faces the less than savoury sides of life.
· The Way of the Table
If you were to mention eugenics to the average man or woman in the street today, most will think of the Nazis or maybe white supremacists, the better informed might refer to the social theories propounded in the 1930, and maybe mention Margaret Sanger, Marie Stopes, H.G. Wells or George Bernhard Shaw and other long dead supporters of a long discredited science. Few, if any, will speak of it as something impacting on their own lives today.
The Lord continues to shower rich blessings upon me day by day by day. Innumerable windfalls enter my life without a single thought, much less a prayer of gratitude uttered from the fullness of my heart!
Note: I've goosed these scans a little for a better appearance on the web, but you may have noticed that some of these have a slightly pinkish cast. I assume the pink newsprint indicated an evening edition of the paper.
But the bureaucrats in positions to charge the NYPD with malfeasance, and possibly point some of the blame at Kelly, may wait and take the temperature of public reaction to this probe as more information comes to light. The public may not particularly mind the fact that officers are willing to make relatively minor offenses disappear. Some may like the idea that a friendly cop might help them avoid a costly summons.
Apparently, according to Very Understanding Hubby, ours have a 'clever' feature. If you get another Fluffie Hating Child Safety Plug and insert the pegs from that one, into the holes on the one in the socket, (sounds a bit dodgee to me!) and twist, you can pull the Fluffie Hating Child Safety Plug out safely. Of course, first of all, I have to get a knife to shove down the back of another Fluffie Hating Child Safety Plug so I can get the darn thing out!
Unfortunately, many people seem to be abandoning Instagram as seen on Twitter and other chat rooms even though it has been insisted that Instagram will still continue to remain separate from Facebook. All that the two companies want is to expand their networks and create better social network experiences for people around the world.
this is about new life. babies. friends and what matters. life matters. the miraculous creation that is encompassed into a little life. a new little person with hopes and dreams and fears...but for now he is mostly focused on the basics. eat, poop, and sleep. but little baby keller will one day be a husband, father, and friend. his life matters. who he will become matters. what he is about matters. and without a doubt in my mind this little guy will be prayed for and loved so deeply the rest of his life because little man lucked out. he does not even have the faintest idea what he was born into. who is mom and dad are....like crazy lucky. cliff and laura are legit and real and honest and funny. we get each other. you know how you might have a hand full of people that really get you. like get you, get you...well these are two of those for us. they encourage us. teach us. are real with us and we have a created a space in our friendship where we can be brutally honest. about marriage. ministry. our faults. our fears. our joys. our heartache. it has been sweet and genuine and real.
This is your government for you. If you allow it to do so, and are unwise enough to trust what it tells you, it will kill you. And even if it doesn't kill you, it will rob you blind.
His words illustrate the small, mundane detail and the quiet courage of his days, the waste of a lost generation. I now know that my grandfather was a ghost of a man, one of the many living dead who returned to continue with a life that had little meaning. At the age of fifty he gave up and waited to die. He was to spend the next forty-one years in that particular waiting room. He sat in an armchair, reading Dickens or watching old Westerns. He hardly ever talked, he was a silent character who smoked two packets of Woodbines a day and drank tea with so much sugar that the spoon would stand up for a second or more. His only food was buttery, mashed potatoes with a fried egg on top.
I probably appreciate it more now, since it's so rare.
Why didn’t we use the big table? Good story, I’ll tell you. So, when we first moved in, I arranged the big bookshelves where I wanted them, and just slapped the books up there. No order. Remember me telling you that Captain America wouldn’t like it - hehehe. Well, there were 2 painted white bookshelves, and 2 brown (unpainted) bookshelves. Captain America decided today that he wants to paint it.
“It took great courage to write this memoir…. Our discomfort with love and failure has helped create and fuel a foster-care bureaucracy that often operates with a breathtaking lack of humanity. Bridge survived to write this beautiful, moving memoir. So many children don’t.” — Los Angeles Times
So I went to Amy's Bread and picked up one of theirs. I was admittedly wary. The cookie was on the brown side of golden brown. It was thick and big. I thought it was going to taste like a stale Italian cookie that hooks you its perfect looks only to be hard and crunchy and taste like absolutely nothing.
pronunciation of the base numerals:
Story: To save the Ransei region from Nobunaga, a powerful Warlord who is trying to take over Ransei, players must conquer different kingdoms to strengthen and grow their own kingdom. There are 17 kingdoms in total to conquer. Conquering all 17 kingdoms and ultimately uniting the kingdom will awaken the Legendary Pokémon and save the land from destruction. Story mode is organized by episodes. Players unlock episodes as they progress and each episode features a different playable Warlord and victory conditions.
Sometimes you want a scene that doesn’t exactly answer necessary questions. Perhaps you have more game time left than story, or maybe the players want to spend time talking to an NPC. Either way, these scenes can be fun, but they can really slow down the pace of a game. Be careful about using these scenes often.
4. The boy can climb where he pleases...
I think I got the scrapbook bug either around the end of college or when I first started teaching. I know I have some pages from my first apartment so it was probably around that time in 2001-2002. I never really did it consistently and I never felt caught up because it took so long to do pages. I have some from a few years that are completed, 2 albums from my England trip, and an almost finished wedding album, but after that, but all the other pictures are in boxes.
Time available: 7th of April 2012, 10am / 14th of April 2012, 10am
60 gr (1/4 cup)of soft butter, cubed
at 7 am, i wake up to bedside coffee, a la ruggy. this stuff is GOOD, yo. and i get a morning kiss, added bonus. surf le web for an hour, then stroll over to my sewing corner and study what's on the table.
Jon Meacham (If he isn’t on your blogroll – he should be.)
I just used regular ol' paint brushes if I remember correctly, with all the grooves I decided to take the risk of brush marks since rolling would just be one more step. But brush marks really weren't so bad, they were barely visible, since we lightly sanded in-between each coat!
When approached, Wang said she missed her two daughters, aged 10 and four, very much.
We'll start with the main bathroom.
She mends
Sorry kids....blame your Papa for getting me to sign up for the full satellite package again. :/
Vinegar marinated Olives - 3
So there is the list. There are some other shows around the edges. I’ve not seen Battlestar Galactica, but this is reckoned to be very good. It is on Netflix streaming so I may try it out soon. The Shield was excellent in beginning but misses out due to losing the plot a bit in it’s final two seasons. It did have an ending, but didn’t quite do it for me. Walton Goggins went from this to Justified (he was / is excellent in both) Game of Thrones I absolutely love, but it is simply too new. If the second season is as good or better than the first, this might be replacing something above. Rome was good but after being cancelled for the end of the second season, had to rush a bit to finish things off. Boardwalk Empire, was a close call, excellent in places but a little lacking in tension for me. Plus they killed off my favourite character at the end of last season so that might take away something for me. Terminator: The Sarah Connor chronicles was much more fun than I thought it would be, and might have been a contender had it not gotten cancelled without an ending. Lost was top fun but had a crappy ending that didn’t explain enough for me and just didn’t do it justice for me either. That was a shame as the shortened final seasons had mostly been a joy.
Bake for about 20 – 25 minutes until slightly raised and golden brown.
In May 2011 the U.S. Supreme Court affirmed the Three-Judge Court order requiring California to reduce the number of inmates in its 33 adult prisons by approximately 33,000 and reach established benchmarks at six-month intervals.
Determination on overdrive so there is no option to fail.
I told you I’d slap avocado on my face to see if it would make me glow. We’ll also have SweetBird do more scary shit, like tattoo her eyelids (she really did that!), or try out the make-up how-to’s in magazines, or the sex advice in Cosmo, or…really whatever we want. It’s our blog. We do what we want. And after we do it, we’ll tell you if you should do it too.
Reverend Ian Smale - better known as Ishmael - released 36 albums in his career but I think the only time he played ska was when he played under the name Ishmael United. Can't be certain though.
pass = fbsvw
Mr Nkomo was brought into the government as vice-president.
Too many of the white right think that if they were holding a 30.06 fitted with a telescopic sight they could have the upper hand, because they know how to use their weapons effectively with deadly accuracy and they could shoot over long distances, but that is not the fight they're up against. I sometimes laugh when I read the notices calling on whites to go for training, conventional military training, in anticipation of a conventional enemy that would abide by the rules. This tendency proves that they had learned nothing from the experiences of the Boers or the French or the Americans or any other similar war where the enemy did not fight a fair fight.
I'm off to market, but will be back Tuesday, November 2nd and will pick the names then.
I admit, I’m a workaholic. Admittance is the first step–right? However, I have been debating an issue with friends for a few months now and we have all have different answers so which is the right answer for a successful career?
I myself made a resolution that I would not write anything critical of you or your administration for at least one year. It was only fair, given the huge mess you were inheriting, a mess that was not only administrative and financial but also, centrally, moral. The Left had so completely dismantled and thrown away all decency and humanity in matters of State that you could trace the roots of all their other failures to this institutionalized immorality; surely you had to be given a fair chance to begin to clean up this overflowing sewer?
Wynkoop Brewing Company Triple Sixes
Once in a standing position, I look down at me soaked body and can't help but join Christine in some full belly laughs! "So you saw me fall in then?" I finally ask.
I’m ok with that.
Spoilers ahead!
They even let me take some cake home for my other half - how nice is that?!
It is my pleasure to introduce Peggy Goetz, a writer-photographer who shares her words and pictures on her blog, On a Day Like Today. Peggy and her husband of 43 years live in an ordinary suburban neighborhood in Irvine, California. Their two grown children and one grandchild live in the central coast and northern parts of the state. Peggy loved her career as a newspaper writer in Orange County, south of Los Angeles, California, and got to write every kind of story, but mostly feature stories, and she sometimes took photos for her stories. A dabbler with many interests, Peggy enjoys writing, travel, oil painting, gardening and reading a wide range of books.
And of course, ours is a nation which is based upon Judeo- Christian values and ethics. Our law is based upon those values and ethics. And in some cases, our law doesn’t encompass — encompass all of the issues that we face around the world.
I've been so busy these days, that I barely have any time to sit down in my craft room and focus. Sometimes I find the creative juices just aren't flowing, or that it's even a little stressful to create original work. In times like these, I find it so therapeutic to sit down and CASE. I had a great time recreating Natasha's Everyday Enchantment Butterflies cards. These were so simple and yet big WOW factor! It will be great to have a stack of these on hand. I also did this straight CASE out of Stampin' Up!'s SAB catologue. The stamp set Kindness matters and all the accessories are still available from the main catogue. I love how versatile this little set is. I've used it on several cards and a sweet little 6" x 6" scrapbook page that I will show you soon. Plus this sweet little set is only $10.95 (c) or $14.95 (w)!
(Insert: A quick survey of those of you that I know of that customarily read this blog, that are interested in football at all:
My tears suddenly stopped. Dried up and gone. My grip loosened on the phone. It was no longer my lifeline. I looked up at Tony, the kind cashier, and my eyes met his. “Okay, mom. I understand. I got this. I’ll see you later.” I pushed to button to hang up, and handed the phone back to him. His eyes seemed to say that he understood, at least a little, of what had just happened.
I love the simplicity of the card and think its just as beautiful as the room. Paper: Recollections Cardstock, DCWV Nana's Nursery Circut: Gypsy Wanderings Stamp: Clear Dollar Stamps Ink: Studio G Pearls: Recollections Pearls Ribbon: Offray Adhesive: Scotch ATG
Peter Nelson, who was born in 1941, is the son of an a estate labourer and groom and worked on the estate with his father as a child. Nelson founded his family garage business in 1968 in the North Yorkshire village of Helperby and took on the local paper round with the help of his daughters, Sandra and Louise, when the local shop closed. The family have had several horses out of their mare Magic Bloom, who was bred by former senior racecourse judge Jonathan Dimsdale and was purchased from James Dooler’s North Humberside yard in a private deal after a syndicate in the yard found it couldn’t pay for the horse. The most notable performer is According To Pete, who was reared on an acre behind the garage. An 11-time winner, he has earned in excess of £210,000 in his career and is now on course for a crack at the John Smith’s Grand National. Nelson has all his horses with trainer Malcolm Jefferson, who also trained Magic Bloom for Nelson. Other notable performers for Nelson include The Magic Bishop, who won three times during 2011 at Newcastle, Market Rasen and Hexham. No previous John Smith’s Grand National runners
Our clear sunlit windows
The composite index of inputs into residential construction declined 0.4% (NSA) in October, after being unchanged (NSA) in September, but it is up 5.9% year-over-year. This month-over-month decline was driven mainly by falling energy prices, with gasoline (-5.0% NSA) and #2 diesel fuel (-2.2%) included in the index. The price index for copper also fell sharply (-8.0% NSA), but the index for most other building materials increased. While many materials experienced only a modest rise (between +0.1% and +0.6%), stronger price increases were observed in the indexes for gypsum (+3.0%), plywood (+3.0%) and asphalt roofing and siding (2.5%).
"Outro (Revisited)" has that dope, manic and upbeat feel to it that blurs the lines between Hip-Hop, punk and speed metal..I digs this.. I rage to this...I will throw a TV at your head to this...
Perhaps South Africa really suits the take on Viognier that I appreciate as my rethink on the grape started when I tasted one made by my friend Lorna Hughes:
“Tell you what I’ll do. I’ll deputize you right here to be authorized to scoop up that poor bastard and take him to the dump.”
In Mr Sheridan’s case, as we now know, he failed at both hurdles. It has been reported that the judge who refused leave at the first stage was Lord Wheatley and last week Lords Hardie and Emslie and Lady Paton finally refused Mr Sheridan leave to appeal.
Even innocuous reports, such as this Muslim article, are cause for concern: "Today, most Mexican Islamic organizations focus on grassroots da'wa. These small organizations are most effective at the community level, going from village to village and speaking directly to the people." Although this may not sound problematic, the strain of Islam being spread by many of these da'wa organizations is the radical, "Salafist," anti-American variety. Here, for instance, is a popular Egyptian TV cleric saying that while Muslims must never smile to non-Muslims—who, as "infidels," are by nature the enemy—they are free to do so if the Muslim is engaged in da'wa, trying to win over the infidel into the fold of Islam, especially if the potential convert can help empower Islam in any way.
Let’s be clear on one thing- there really isn’t a ‘Womack Militia.’ This fictitious moniker derives from the LEED-IE PAC’s shameless political ads in the local daily, seeking to demonize one of the county’s hardest working and most fiscally conservative public servants while mobilizing anti-conservative feelings to defeat GOP candidates that Commissioner Womack (and the Republican Party) support. Ironically, there is a groundswell of anti-liberal sentiment in Lee County. Citizens here are fed up with the boorish behavior of those who seek to perpetuate higher taxes and elevated spending levels without accountability in our county. Rather than a ‘militia,’ the voters of Lee County are coming after those who pretend to serve the interests of our citizens (but who really are just taking care of their buddies, the good old boys of Lee County).
Ali continues to be a source of strength in my own life. Even still, when I face a challenge I remind myself of the way that Ali grabbed the bull by the horns and jumped into situations without a second thought, or so it appeared. If I convince myself that I can’t do something, I am quickly reminded of the time that Ali told me herself “If I can do it, you can do it,” and “Your life is too short to live in fear,”
I know I need to get rid of it. The ring has to go. It's part of the healing, the moving on.
For example, a new word will come up in the course of conversation, I will shake my head and give him a Look, and he will nod with acquiescence so that we both acknowledge that it is now on the List.
because rhian/crowwoman asked:
The Advertising Standards Authority should extend its remit to include in-store positioning of products and all point-of-sale marketing.
FH: I think it would be a good idea to hold a spring festival as well, and to have double the events so people have a choice, have it more concentrated.
www.tollgateholt.co.uk
And now the nasty tweets:
Says Mock:
Quarles doesn’t finish his run, however, before revealing who really shot Trooper Tom. I was totally right last week in guessing it was Arlo. Arlo has always been a curious character on the show. One often wonders how this man with ambiguous morals and a cutthroat attitude toward the people around him could have fathered Raylan, a man with a strict sense of morality and empathy. But there’s no doubt that Arlo is crazy like a fox. While the whole season has suggested he has been slipping into dementia, and rightly so for the most part, Arlo knows what he’s doing when he wants to. Like taking the blame for killing Devil. (That was a plot quickly taken care of for Boyd). Or killing the man in the hat. In probably the most gutting line of the show, Raylan reveals that “He didn’t know it was a state trooper. He just saw a man in a hat, pointing a gun at Boyd.” Arlo wanted to kill his own blood to protect Boyd, his true son.
This friend of mine who plays hockey started out with his current team and was expecting to have a great season. He worked really hard over the summer and went to camp in good shape, ready for the new season. Only a little over a month into the season, he’s already struggling. He only has two goals, although his team is counting on him to be one of their top scorers, so he’s expected to have more. His team is in second to last place. I’ve watched his ice time go from around 25 minutes a game, to barely 11. He’s already been a healthy scratch, twice. I’m waiting for 1) a trade or 2) a trip down.
I've also applied for another job, which is taking more than two months to get anywhere at, and also my current job keeps shorting mine and everyone else's checks because they're on a downward spiral toward closing their doors.
We are all bringing a dish to pass, but since it's taking place in our Casa, I'm in charge of the 80s decor. My budget is $20 or under. Bring on the Goodwill!!! I seriously love the Goodwill. It's better than chocolate. Okay, maybe not chocolate, but I love it.
I will be participating in this Read Along, so you’ll have me as company! I have read a few chapters of this book, and I think that the authors communicate maximal knowledge in minimal pages. My Dad read this book, and he thought it was quite good, as well.
sings to your soul
If you’re wondering what happened to my NaHaWriMo posts, the answer is this: since Frogpond recently changed its policy of allowing submissions of haiku that have appeared on FB or Twitter, but NOT on blogs, I made the difficult decision not to post them on this blog, but to hold them out for possible submission. However, they can still all be read on FB on the NaHaiWriMo page, along with a myriad of other wonderful haiku from many of the 321 people who follow this page.
Secret police agents abducted and beat award-winning blogger Yoani Sanchez, whose online reports elironicle the dark side of life in Cuba, on her way to a march for non-violence, she said, reports AFP (Nov. 9, 2009):
Abbotsford to Vakwini;
Sincerity had motivated us in the 1992 referendum
Tip: Wigan going at 3/1 in Ladbrokes, and 16/5 in StanJames. It’s where my money would go.
I got my eyes checked during the week. After years and years of wearing lovely little rectangular glasses I thought it might be time for an upgrade. It's been six years since my last check up.
I love to write and wish maybe I had done something more along that line. I wish I had chosen to do something more artsy...something where I could allow my creative juices to flow and not be restricted in a boring 9-5 job.
About the way I feel
Beer lovers all across the United States celebrate the Mother of All Beer Weeks annually as the culture of craft brewing gets celebrated in all 50 states. During American Craft Beer Week, tens of thousands of craft-beer lovers participate in over 6,000 gatherings that are hosted by over 300 breweries. (May 14 – 20)
I’m glad I read the book, but I do not think it is Deborah Moggach’s best novel and it might disappoint her admirers.
We added the watermelon pink ribbon to the top of the frame to tie that color throughout the room. We only used the pink as an accent in the room. We then painted the letters white with left over paint from her dresser. The letters were glued on to the glass of the frame, the frames weren't deep enough to put the letters inside. To add another detail to the letters we then added a symbol to go with each letter.
I’ve gone on in the past about how ‘man’ used to be neutral, ‘wif’ indicated female, and ‘vir’ indicated male. And what continues to bug me is that while ‘man’ became male-specific, language did not shift to maintain common use of a neutral term, so that now we end up with a modern English whose euphony still likes to be able to refer to all people with a single syllable but whose supposedly-neutral term is blatantly gender-referential. Let’s be very clear: this is not a woman-only issue (oh look I just realised what the next short post will be about). This is a legitimately egalitarian thing – treating ‘man’ as generic both exoticises/marginalises women and it generifies men, contributing to the idea that men are not special, not important, et cetera.
As a human kill switch in an artificial intelligence-managed resource exploration station on one of Saturn’s moons, he finds that ticking boxes and pushing buttons is awful, even when it’s done where no man has gone before. His counterpart and confidant, Cara Moretti, occupies another facility, where she discovered this unpleasantness months ago. Their days are rigidly structured by their employer, the Koyamatsu Interplanetary Development Concern.
Of course this led to a long discussion in which evil bro and I expressed things we weren't agreeing on. There were many. To my surprise, we ended up having more in common than I thought
Also the formation of the BN club has yet to get the approval from the BN Supreme Council
As we age though, and this is another aspect of life that’s been written about ad nauseam, we lose that sense of adventure through our acquisition of knowledge. As my mind grew, I slowly realized that the vast expanse of the forest behind the cornfield where I grew up was actually very tiny, and the huge river that we used as a landmark was actually a little creek (Wilmot Creek). I started mapping what our adventures in my mind and realized that everything that I thought was huge and wonderful and beautiful, was actually not that big at all. Still beautiful though, I can’t take that away from it. So I started looking beyond my backyard, into the rest of the world and found that exploring the whole thing would be impossible and that I’d never truly be able to be a part of the rest of the world the way I was a part of that forest when I was a kid because of the limitations we all have to live within. Time, money, life: They all get in the way. Soon you realize that adventure is impossible and even if it were, you’d never be a discoverer. You’d be a tourist.
If a user meets his burden of demonstrating that he performed a reasonably
Well, sure as Hell I do! Take this link as an example. Somewhere in the USA (hint: PHILLY) people started turning against the doctors and the whole scientific world for that matter, because......well, god knows why, I haven't the slightest idea! Some of the possible reasons for this stupid stupid decision of the free people are revealed in these two videos by Penn Jilette and Teller in their tv show Penn & Teller's Bullshit!. Be sure to watch them both because.......fuck, people are so stupid. Go on...I assure you the rest of the post won't disappear.
5 eggs
This is Spinal Tap
If I ever turn around and see a bull running toward me I can only hope that the news story doesn’t read like this:
I didn't make it very far at all today, but at least I made it. I'm experiencing a lot of tingling in my feet and I think that is coming from parts of my feet aren't use to much pressure because I pronate when I walk or run. I'm also experiencing a lot of cramping in my side. After research and talking to some more experienced runners I have to focus on my breathing. The cramping is coming from shallow breathing (breathing from my chest) and not breathing from my diaphragm. Week 2 will be spent focusing on my breathing and better nutrition to work my mileage up to at least 2 miles each run.
and now you know what to do with that gigantic frame sitting in the basement.
Oh come on I do not want to miss the plane, the lady looks at him and says.
He felt the cheering power of spring,
Regardless of where you spend it, I wish you each a Happy Mother’s Day. I’d love to think that everyone reading my words had a mother like mine, a woman of faith who taught me from childhood of the Risen Savior who saves souls and anchors lives. But, dear reader, if that’s not your past, I hope you know it can be your future. I pray you’ll be the one that begins such a legacy, and that you’ll be moved to start building that heritage today.
1001 Ways to Market Your Books - John Kremer (Guess I should move this one to the top of the list, eh? :-))
PITTSBURGH, April 24, 2012 /PRNewswire via COMTEX/ –The PNC Financial Services Group today announced that its Board of Directors has elected William S. Demchak president of the corporation and its principal banking subsidiary, PNC Bank, National Association. Read More
You can’t possibly believe we take you seriously, can you?
Because, as Donald Barthelme says (I just re-read "The School"), "You needn't be frightened (though I am often frightened) and that there is value everywhere."
Of course, this model is nothing new. It’s been used for years in the IT arena, in which workers typically come in to a company to perform a specific task (such as a server installation), then leave and return only on an as-needed basis. What is new, however, is the broadening range of tasks that just-in-time workers are being hired for.
Fried Portabella Appetizer Buttermilk batterd and ancho dusted portabella mushroom caps served with petit salad and ancho buttermilk ranch. $8.95
Now you might think a 48 hour drive might be a great opportunity to get some quality writing done. I did, and was I ever wrong! Surprisingly, sitting inches from a time zone confused baby who’s increasingly tired of being in the car (my son, not my husband) somehow doesn’t exactly provide the uiet I need to concentrate on writing/editing. I think I got in maybe a good hour, fueled by too much caffeine.
Seriously though, when are we going to be able to sleep again? When are we going to be able to not stress and worry about every single aspect of our lives, most importantly about her life? We won't. This is our new life.
Note: Aside from Jesus Himself, there are many saintly souls in the church who we can model ourselves to in living a crucified life. To name a few: St, Francis of Assisi, St. Ignatius Loyola, and St. Therese of Lisieux (etc.), however, I, personally, have taken to a humble monk named Brother Lawrence, because he exemplified to me how you can take any basic work or office for making a living, such as kitchen work, and use that as your entrance into the Kingdom of Heaven by living out the Crucified Life within its limited constraints.
"This is a bill that is bipartisan, bicameral and tri-institutional," said Rep. Jim Leach (R-Iowa), chairman of the House Banking and Financial Services Committee. He noted that the House, Senate and White House had worked together on the compromise that became law.
If you go to your grave without painting your masterpiece,
2 By the mouth of babes and infants, you hast founded a bulwark because of your foes, to still the enemy and the avenger.
I am really hoping to get a lot of crafting time in today. I managed three cards yesterday!
Bian said he was told that the distribution of the free laptops is being carried out without proper guidelines and with no thought as to who will derive real benefit from receiving the laptops.
I still crave cookies. I struggle daily. Some days I win, some days the food does. But the bottom line is that with each setback comes opportunity to learn and to grow both emotionally and spiritually.
For a start a camera is genderless. Anyone can carry one, so I had no idea just from examinging my object who it might have belonged it. Similarly they are ageless… young people and grandparents are equally likely to have a camera these days, and being a disposable one had the disadvantage to a fraudulent person of it being a generic standard design. You could not tell if it was the sort of things likely for an older person to know how to use just from looking at it. Lastly, it was black all over. So no helpful pink colours or stickers that might give something away. While the others examined their various keys, earrings, rings and chains (and in one case a chapstick), I turned the camera over in my hands and analysed it first from a scientific viewpoint. I could see that the item was worn on the edges, meaning it’s owner had had it for a while and likely kept it in some sort of bag. This could still equally point to a man or a woman. Being disposable and with around 6 pictures left on the reel, the owner had either bought it for one particular event, then failed to use all the snaps or they took pictures infrequently. I felt this pointed to someone older than some of the younger members of group but it was not particularly conclusive.
His photographs were, in fact, quite amazing, in the style of Lewis Carroll(Charles Dodgson) and like Carroll’s caused a modicum of controversy.
And I quite like it! It was so quick and easy, just like you all said, especially without sleeves. I started and finished it on Derby day, which seemed fast considering a large chunk of that day was actually spent at a cookout betting on horses and eating junk food. With a major mint julep hangover from Oaks night before.
Just complete entire countries sulking for years.
Now your task is to try setting custom white balance, taking a picture & then taking the same picture using Auto White Balance. Compare the results from both on your computer’s monitor & see the difference. I bet, you’ll become a follower of Custom White Balance.
“You’ll be out of practice — you understand that? — if you do that again,” said Meyer, while a couple of spectators still sat in the stands. “I told you five years ago: Don’t mess with our players. Don’t do it. You did it. You do it one more time and the Orlando Sentinel’s not welcome here ever again. Is that clear? It’s yes or no.” (finger pointing toward the face)
Corban can be very serious about his art. He was singing “Happy birthday” until I turned the video camera on. (Of course.)
Sunday morning, I rolled out of bed, blurry eyed and slightly dazed. I was sure someone had replaced my head with one of those ovoid watermelons, big as a newborn babe, while I slept. I could hear the mushy, juice soaked flesh sloshing around inside, or was that my brain? After the boys had gone to bed the night before, Hubs had stirred up a seemingly unending line of Moscow mules, to mark the end of a work week so fraught with tension, we were both frazzled by Friday. He makes a mean cocktail, and I did each one justice.
The visionless
Saint Nicholas: A Blow For Christ
That you can give, my heart beguiles;
When we finally came home the physio's and her teachers at school also noticed positive differences with Danielle’s progression and she just carried on achieving more goals. We are not saying she was never ill again or never had another set back because that would be untrue, but today we still have her with us and she is 14yrs old. She has come so far and she is still very happy, she continues to say an odd word when she wants to but never said that one again!
but i kind of doubt they'll happen.
And I smiled, and sung “Try again”….
Today there is a shrine to Lydia and a small chapel beautifully constructed and adorned with icons where Lydia came to faith. These were beautiful to be sure. But the really moving moment came when I walked to the shoreline of this fast-moving stream. Some of the building stones from the old Apian Way are still there. In a bend in the river, we could imagine Paul and Lydia entering the stream where her faith was confirmed in baptism. With her were members of her household, Luke tells us. Whether they were only adults or included children is unknown. What we do know is that Lydia’s informed faith (she believed in the God of the Jews) was claimed by the Risen Messiah, Jesus.
ROM 1:21 Because that, when they knew God, they glorified him not as God, neither were thankful; but became vain in their imaginations, and their foolish heart was darkened.
Mac Miller – Clarity (Prod. By ID Labs & Ritz Reynolds)
It’s just another price for you being beautiful
Instead of saying: That's crazy. I would never do that. How could that mother do that to her child?
If you have never ridden a motorcycle, but have a casual mindset towards it, go ahead and rent a bike or buy one. It is definitely not a disappointing experience; as a Casual Biker, you will enjoy all the luxuries a hardcore biker would, but it will be more staggered and more by chance…
Night night x
It was wonderful to have a small meeting of the Western Washington chapter of the SCBWI in one of our local libraries for a Clark County SCBWI Schmooze!
as the light from Prometheus slowly dims
Gifts – You know those sweet little checks you may get from Grandma or Aunt Sue on those special occasions.
1. Be There
OK, it’s just the temperature – but with your other Arduino knowledge from our tutorials and elsewhere – you can wire up all sorts of sensors, poll them from your Arduino and use the ethernet shield and an internet connection to access that data from anywhere. Here are some applications that spring to mind, all can be made possible with details from our previous tutorials:
Well........I'm getting ready right now to leave "on a jet plane" and head to Disney World....So, I'm keeping this one short and sweet. It's Sketch reveal day at Frosted Designs and we are hoping you will join us for the challenge this week!!! Here is the fabulous sketch.....and my layout to go with it.
I've been away for awhile. The last few months haven't been the easiest, but I'm finding myself missing the blog world. I'm taking that as a sign that it's time to come back.
3 womb
davidamartin@live.com
But then, in the last paragraph, it became clear that there was in fact a rational explanation for how all the 'magic' happened. I was devastated. It was like finding out Santa Claus doesn't exist, or that it wasn't the Tooth Fairy who left a sixpence beneath your pillow. Or, it was like one of those escapades where the main character wakes up and realises 'it was all a dream'. This wasn't a magazine story, so there was no fiction editor in the background insisting the events had a plausible cause. Maybe the writer felt they were straining credibility too much by pursuing the magical theme right to the end. Or perhaps they lost confidence in their original idea. Either way, it was a shame.
1. Preschool. Miss M will be about 2 years ten months when we can put her in preschool. But SHOULD we? I just can't seem to answer that for myself, in part because I don't know what she will be like as a little person at that point. I feel like it should really depend on her, and where she is at, and that the information that is key to this decision won't be available to me for many months. But preschool applications are due NOW, and the waitlists are just insane.
The hip hop show was interesting. I wish I would have more time to appreciate it, but I really just wanted to be home because ballet had gone extra long this week.
I couldn’t resist.
Amazing & Magical Sentiments mini (VIP exclusive stamp set - will never be offered for sale or be available again $9 value, FREE)
Before I came to Saudi Arabia, I studied Arabic for ten months. One of the skills we practiced was listening, first to audio files, and, eventually, with videos as well. One video in particular caught my eye - it was of hundreds of people wading in shallow water catching fish - with nets, with their bare hands, with their clothes, really with anything handy. It looked like so much fun! And when I found out it was in Saudi, that was it. I had to go. I mean, I HAD to go.
168Shades ev'ry flow'r, and darkens ev'ry green,
2 blank
But then, my friend asked if I wanted to join them for 1/2 off wings at a local restaurant. SIGH! It was soooooo hard to say no. But I am proud of myself because I said no and I got up and did my Insanity Pure Cardio workout and Cardio Abs.
Randa Abdel-Fatta broke ground with Does My Head Look Big In This? And, there's Robin Brande (Evolution, Me, and Other Freaks of Nature), Matthue Roth (Never Mind the Goldbergs), Mitali Perkins (Sunita Sen), Dana Reinhardt (A Brief Chapter in My Impossible Life), Emily Wing Smith's heartfelt The Way He Lived, Margaret Peterson Haddix's Leaving Fishers, and Pete Hautman's Godless or Timothy Carter's Epoch. And those are just books read by me (and people in my blogging circle) whose titles I could think of offhand.
Christ’s Righteousness…..
6. "If one thing makes you think of another thing, you form a connection between them in your mind. The more connections you have, the better access you have to cross-connections. The more things something can remind you of, the more you know about it, or are learning about it." Sandra Dodd
Even some of post-apartheid South Africa’s most strategic partners from the global south seem to be sending tough messages to Pretoria. One of these was communicated in dramatic fashion recently, when Brazil, Russia, India and China (the so-called Bric countries) met on their own in Moscow, without South Africa. The effect of such an event becomes all the more clear when we take into account that South Africa is an initiator state of the India- Brazil-South Africa Trilateral Forum, as well as a founder member of the New Asia-Africa Strategic Partnership, a champion of the G-77+China, and a key strategic partner of Russia.
And then the roti came. And though I am biased as I have LOVED and been loyal to Bacchus roti shop back in Toronto for over 20 years, I had to admit, this was excellent. JW agreed - luckily they gave me my hot sauce on the side!
Oh, and the Pony has a Death Star on her butt.
The comprehensive menu runs through the usual suspects of stir-fries, congees and hotpots. Fried glutinous rice ($13) is a satisfying mix of sticky rice with slivers of omelette, mushroom, shallots and lap cheong pork sausage. Dig into the garlic chives with pork blood and pork skin ($10.80). It’s one way to increase your iron levels.
The wind is howling, the rain is pelting itself against the window and the house is groaning in protest under the wiles of the storm that's whirling about it's shutters.
Sometimes things just fall into place. Actually, often times they do. Having just released the first collection of Girly Bits a few weeks ago, I was thrilled to be invited by the local Shoppers Drug Mart to show the collection during the 'Look Good Feel Better' Gala SDM was hosting here in Kingsville Ontario.
I would like to know if the oldest parts of the bible are “chantable”, whether they are in poetry, whether authentic translations of them exist, whether they sound anything like sanskrit/prakrit/tamil/telugu-kannada. (See this link : http://www.v-a.com/bible/ancient_aramaic_audio_files.html .. to my untrained ears it sounds like arabic… not like sanskrit or kannada-telugu-tamil.. any thoughts?)
They plant their flag on top of a beacon, link arms in a circle, and sing about their history and people and dreams. A young woman sings a solo, her voice clear and strong and haunting. I walk away, an outsider, witnessing something too private.
"The World's Most Refreshing Beer"
Now my life is really over
This one caught my attention, as it is from the state my husband is originally from - Missouri. I loved the finish on the china and that is what originally got my attention. This is stamped Japan on the back.
The villain
Maybe it was coincidence? Maybe this is normal? I don’t know nor do I care. I believed she’s be “healed” and she was. That’s all the matters. Of course I thanked God and got incredibly relaxed, so much so that I passed out.
When I got home, I found wonderful fruits and vegetables on the counter.
I thought I'd start off this week (yes, I do realize it's Thursday) with a little taste of what we are loving these days.
Battery:
You are a mist
I know a lot of women pride themselves on NOT needing a man.....but I am so thankful that I CAN'T do it all and much of the time NEED Greg to do things for me.
If it was so easy to cast aside a love that would’ve defied all odds
lily: can we never go to the beach again? what if a shark eats me?
Another thing that McKinley has really been into lately is coloring! Anytime she sees crayons she gets excited and starting saying, "color, color, color!" Here she is lounging around coloring a picture :)
Delight our ears this week!
To quote her exactly “Women hate me because I’m beautiful”, no dear, we don’t HATE you, we just enjoy laughing at you. I think it’s fair to say that when I’d finished reading, I expected to see a vision of excellence, perhaps Venus from Botticelli’s work of art, but no, instead what I saw was a tired, middle-aged, pot-bellied average woman in a ‘tailored’ purple dress.
Contentment is a tough decision that pops up more often than a person realizes. It starts with a simple comparison, in my case to the lifestyle I admired in another friend. When the comparison turns into a stark contrast where I do not willing accept my individual life, with distinct quirks and challenges, I become the enemy of my life because I am fighting contentment.
Pinky: Shark Attack
Thanks so much everyone.
Mr. W and I had no such stories whatsoever after spending 3 days in Vegas this week. The wildest thing he did was wear his flip flops for an entire day (he has short toe cleavage and generally doesn't find sandals to be the most comfortable option) and I got crazy by buying a pair of shorts at the Banana Republic outlet. (I've been wearing long cargo shorts only for the past several years—haven't owned an actual short pair of shorts in who knows how long.) We are wildly out of control like that, and in addition to hitting up the outlets we also drove to Lake Mead and toured around the Hoover Dam.
For this recipe, MaMa Hsu said its best to use leftover rice so they don’t clump up. You want loose rice for this dish or the texture will be off. She variations of this recipe by using a variety of different meats for this dish such as ham, bacon, chicken, or beef. I used Chinese sausage for this demonstration and they can be purchased at any Chinese market. The one in particular that I got mine at was 99 Ranch Market. I’ve attached the link here to help you locate a store nearest to you. The other ingredients should be easily available at your local market.
Im doing just fine, a little stressful times right now maybe, but nothing i cant handle.
links are here ( dont forget to buy their products for support ‘em )
“Yeah, I don’t’ think that it would be good for either of us.” He said. And we left it at that. However, once Sunday night rolled around, we both knew that our weekend together was coming to an end.
Another box of type bars, type slugs, and brand new (but rather large) platens. I didn't pick any of these up because I figured they would be as rock-hard (due to age) as any of the others I had, plus the chances they would fit anything would be pretty slim since I didn't have any measurements at hand. I was hoping the ribbon boxes contained actual ribbons, but they were all chock-full of spare type slugs.
Since victims are girls and they are from pitiable social backgrounds. Not only bride trafficking, but other issues related to these girls like ‘genital-singe’ and ‘witch killings’ are also ignored by media and elite civil society.
A water plantain –
She turned on the outside light and told me to come outside. She brought me out back and showed me the dents in the ground. She shook her head.
I'm not interested in finding a step-parent for the boys, I think a marriage and separation are a lot to deal with already (I was a single mom when I met my ex-husband; he and I had Seth together). I don't think I want a relationship relationship, just because I can't imagine meeting anyone special enough to introduce to the boys. But a date might be nice. Friends with benefits, maybe?
Jeff: Laughing, I actually have some funny pictures that I would share with you but don’t have them here with me.
You can make the frosting while the muffins are baking and then set it in the
1/2 package of gluten free noodles
Now on to my project!!!
“Sun, stand still at Gibeon,
Hi all my beautiful bloggy friends! Well, a lot has been going on as I have had to weave my life and artwork in and out of my fibro these last several weeks. I reluctantly resigned my spot on Poisoned Peas DT leaving me with only one regular DT spot, *sigh* but it had to be done...I just lost all energy to do anything! No whining, well except for that little bit just now...(smile)
31 And as Jehu entered in at the gate, she said, Had Zimri peace, who slew his master?
Both bags have a LOTV Topper and Sentiment, and leftover papers from my stash.
I cook these delicious meals because I WANT to, because I LOVE to, because it gives ME joy- the preparing but most of all the SHARING.
I always start at the mid point on the back side of the leg,
And Yet The Government Still Issues “Tickets” to Vagrants…..
I honestly do not believe that there are “toxins” in your body. The very definition of a toxin is a poison. Here’s a link to a good definition. Do we put things into our bodies that are not good for us? Yes. Of course, I can name a few: cigarette smoke, alcohol, McDonald’s fries! haha!
Nelson was crowned Miss America last month. She took over from Tara Conner, 21, who was almost sacked from the role after admitting taking drugs.
(Martial VI.74)
It's super easy (I wouldn't make it if it wasn't).
believe it or not, i actually have a TON of my own books to give away, most of which i'll be donating to my local libraries, but! i have set aside a few to give away here. six, to be exact.
For anyone living in Durban, South Africa - I'll be selling these goodies at the I Heart Market on Saturday. Checkout their blog for more details and other stallholders. http://www.ihearmarket.blogspot.com/
I love challenges and to know different cultures and make new friends. Looking forward to have fun with you all!
Now stitch around the sheet music in a random line.
As she yapped Pat flicked the switch with his foot once more. She then stopped and went to move the table across the floor. She struggled and pushed a bit and then had her same old fit.
There are some great toys in this sale:
Hi Folks,
2 big pieces of rock sugar
Father, cause __________ to love the Word of God with all his heart and enable him to memorize and meditate on it all day (Psalm 119:97).
- Basic Beauty by Limoni - I-don't-remember-the-number-right-now: another (almost) dupe of a Zoya one, I think it's pretty close to Zoya - Rica. What do you think about it?
For my entree I had les Ouffs Mourette which exploded with flavour in my mouth and we both had Coq au Vin washed down with a local wine suggested by our Maitre D.
The look on his face was strange, wild, vain. I said,
Immediately after the game while Bynum was interviewed by the local TV station, he drops some profanity before the station could mute him. He might not see this as a big deal but he needs to consider the children who are watching this game. Kids today look up to athletes as role models. They will emulate anything athletes do because we put them on a pedestal. Andrew Bynum needs to mature before he can take the next step to superstardom.
I want to do something artsy fartsy now.
Throwing my load onto the closest bed, I took a quick look around.
Or a woman who wants to be seen as an observant follower
61) I wear bi-focals. I've worn bi-focals since 9th grade. Some people take them as a sign of getting old and won't wear them, but that's just stupid, as they're damn handy. It was really inconvenient having to take off my reading glasses to look at the board, and then put them back on to copy the notes from the board, and then take them off, and them put them on, ad infinitum, so I told my eye doctor I wanted bi-focals.
Cynjon Noah Quite simply, the groove happens on it's own any time that I have time to myself...be that in time alone at home, or just time *at* home. My work takes me all over the country, and often for months at a time, so I've learned to make the most, creatively, of the free time I do have.
Yield: One 1 1/2-pound loaf.
This will be book two against my goal of 100 for the year. I’m rereading this (out loud) with my seven year old daughter, who has seen the movie dozens of times, and also moved on to the second movie. She can’t move on to the third movie until she reads the first three books.
“I can’t help it.”
“Perhaps it is our karma, perhaps it is our fate that we be with you at the time,” she said drawing a huge round of applause from the gathering of Tibetans after meeting the Dalai Lama.
and soul quickened
its own aggressive sectarian beliefs,
Over the past three years, I have developed a strong network of business and government contacts in Indonesia and Australia that are principally concerned with investment, trade and business between Australia and Indonesia. The PhD research I have undertaken, required a qualitative approach to data collection, whereby I actively engaged in interviews and discussions with over 55 executives and senior managers in Indonesia and Australia. In addition to these interviews I was able to participate in 49 negotiation events, which endowed me with firsthand experience of the Indonesian negotiation style and how it effects and affects international business negotiations. In the academic world there is often a debate about the relative merits of qualitative (ie. Interviews, observations, document analysis etc), and quantitative (Statistics and econometric orientated analysis) methods. In the case of my research, I actively decided upon pursuit of a qualitative methodology due to the challenge of gaining trustworthy data in the Indonesian business environment. As a consequence of this qualitative approach, I have been allowed a unique insight into a multitude of experiences related to Indonesian negotiation and business behaviour. If I add up the collective years of experience in the Indonesian business environment of the 55 senior executives, then I have built up over 300 years of collective knowledge of the business environment, across agribusiness, banking and finance, engineering, mining and education.
We'd walked down a path to the water where an older man with few teeth was sitting on a 55 year old Harley.
On the day I turned 26, I left Atlanta and drove south to New Orleans, for a week of high octane mojo-renewal. I had my rough mixes in tow.
Now that we have finally meet, I would dearly love to keep this friendship alive with visits.
copyright 2012 Deb Scarfo
The coconut. The rest of this thoughtful, sensitive column of intellectual Memela’s is mostly about “the coconut”. He defines coconuts as blacks who aspire to be whites (without giving explicit examples to substantiate his scholarly claim). This must surely be infuriating to aspiring young black men such as fellow blogger The Sumo, who sees himself as “the ultimate transitional South African. Born and raised in a KwaZulu-Natal township near Durban, he was part of the first group of black initiates into the ‘multiracial’ education system. He was (and is) always in contrast to the norm, black in ‘white’ schools, a blazer-wearing coconut in the township streets … ”. I strongly doubt The Sumo wishes to be white or to have a “white” identity (whatever that means). If The Sumo wishes to have an identity where people of all colours have the same identity, rather than the dichotomy black/white, so what? I see in The Sumo’s blogs the following. He defines himself (often humorously to keep things in perspective) as a person first in the context of transitional SA, explores his identity in the changing terrain of Joburg second, and looks at himself as a black person as a close third. He does not say he is the ultimate transitional black, but the ultimate transitional South African, thus avoiding dichotomy or othering people of different “races”. This is so unlike Sandile Memela.
To address the rising demand for drivers ed classes, we offer driver training for not only teens, but also for adults, companies and senior citizens.
but be of harm to no one,
Wild Arms takes place in a world called Filgaia which has been turned into a wasteland thanks to the Great War from well before the game started. The Guardians, a group of magical deities charged with maintaining the natural balance of the world, have come under stress from the world’s natural decline, and eventually they get too weak to fight off the Metal Demon invaders.Enter the main characters, who come from all stretches of the world and end up together in a huge accident.
The human body is a temporary one that houses the spirit that God gave it and that spirit will return to God, while the body goes back to the dust from where it once came. Whether through martyrdom as some early followers of Jesus would clearly suffer or through old age even beyond AD70, Jesus, The Son of Man, would come and receive those who remain faithful unto death, continuing His relationship with us beyond this life and into the next. I could continue developing this much further and probably will when this all gets put in book form. But for now this should suffice for now.
67. Vice nah hurt but conscience ah hurt yuh. Although you tend to be ignored for the wrong things you do, you still have your conscience to deal with.
fought for rights together would plead.
It’s market day as I alight from the train at Rye’s elegant but diminutive station. The little 2-car diesel train from Ashford, something of an anomaly in the mostly electrified south east, is busy with shoppers aiming for the bustling stalls, and with tourists who head uphill from the station, keen to explore the history of this beautiful town.
They lied about their age, snuck in or went with parents.
Tattoo Guy (in case you haven’t read the “About” page, he is my calm, cool, and collected life partner) said “Don’t worry about it, Baby – who cares what she thinks. You’re trying to spread a message that is important to you, and probably to a lot of other women too. And, you know, she only has the power to upset you if you give it to her.” Excellent point…and after thinking about it, I came to the conclusion that he’s absolutely right. (Wow, my man is a total Zen Master in training!)
I would have never guessed I would have this much life going on and this much spirit spilling out.
Fake it till you make it.
At this point I'm about half-way done. It's not been a speedy process due to everything being shoved to the middle of the garage, moved to get to things, moved back again, and slow drying times with humidity, but I'm slowly wrapping it up. I'm also sick of being embarrassed by my completely untouched garage that is apparently the entrance of choice for 99% of the people who come to my house. If they prefer to use the side entrance, then it's going to look as good as the front:)
Forget winning “hearts and minds” — maintaining basic security for coalition forces will be a tough enough job in itself.
I was passing through on a journey that keep trailing off
“What do you want, Doris?” I shouted at the door.
Several other gifts she opened the night before included a little dove charm from my parents for her Charm Bracelet. We’ll hope to get it saudered on this week so she can wear it to Mass next week. I’ll photograph more next week since she opened them after dinner and a shower last night and before I realized it, I was taking pics of her in her Pjs.
I seem to be one of the many followers of Chetan Bhagat’s books and I think I have read all his books. Though I would not describe myself as a fan (his writing needs more); I would like to call my self as an enjoyer of his works. His books are an easy read and serve as a good stress buster. Ideal for a journey or for a weekend that is followed by a week full of stress.
Movement
However, officials from Forest City, Levy, and AEG were not ready to make any estimates beyond "above minimum wage" and "competitive" to venues like Madison Square Garden and Yankee Stadium, saying it would be subject to collective bargaining, since employees are expected to be unionized.
That your best is good enough, the Lord will do the rest
$.25 banana peppers
Stamp: Belles´n Whistles- Snow Fight Snowbaby
What’s the best thing that ever happened to you?
If the Premier League is so keen to be socialist and to level the playing field, lets have all tickets and all merchandise sold centrally by the Premier League. All profits go into a pot and lets have this split equally as well. While we’re at it, lets not allow any club to spend more on players and wages than anybody else. I’m all for socialism, but it needs to be an all or nothing thing, not some half-hearted attempt.
But some powerful magic triggers the appearance of yet another guest--an unexpected one.
In the last 15 days Dena has had carpal tunnel surgery on her right hand, a morton's neuroma removed from her left foot and dental surgery. Monday I take her for carpal tunnel surgery on the left hand. Needless to say she has been a treat...much like I was after surgery.
Despite my decrease in endorphins leading to a song's eventual discontinuation, the endorphins increase exponentially when hearing this song much later as the memory it brings back is vivid and sentimental.
individually, but after several false starts, I give up. To start,
It is a glorious day, perfectly warmed and breezy. God himself must have hand picked the weather. What a great day to sit her in the grass, write and mediate. I could stay here for hours. With the warmth of the sun on my back and the gentle cool breeze across my face. But, hours I don't have. I have an eternity to come and go from this place. And another day perhaps will allow for the hours I seek. But for today, I have to live among the living and enjoy the joyous blessing that is my son. I hope and pray my other friends with babies in heaven will one day know the joy, light and life a living child brings to your life. I am blessed and grateful.
"You know," he says, "the last time I think I really actually ate a lot of what I cooked was when I made that paella. Remember that? Ah, that was a good meal!"
Fill each cupcake with 1 tablespoon of Nutella. Repeat until the Nutella has been evenly divided amongst the cupcakes. Top off each cupcake with a Ferrero Rocher candy, slighting pressing into the Nutella so it stays put.
Hello Everyone! It is a Bitten by the Bug 2 Monday here at Busy with the Cricky. My sweet design team sister Theresa from Blinky Blossoms selected this week's challenge cut. For those who are new to Busy with the Cricky and Bitten by the Bug 2, the weekly challenge cut is a Cricut cut selected by a team member for the entire team to use to create a project. We invite all readers to join us and create a project using the weekly challenge cut. Theresa chose the word "Welcome" for the team to use this week.
I expect he'll attach some shots
The idea of blogging in the sky through the medium of artificial weather—chemically produced, aerodynamic clouds draping the city in a haze of literary climatology—thus presented at least one more alternative way of looking at the highly polarizing urban presence of the Blue Angels.
Servings/wk: They don’t have an omega 3 count, but best guess is 1.5 jars of the old style, which has a bit of the grey fat, they say. Briggsway, if you’re listening, please make sure you include that grey fat.
1 carton of ice cream
In essence, our rituals and rules are just that – they are tools that facilitate the communication of love.
Once you have the safety levers removed (as seen below) the sear assembly can be removed. It will rock out of place and should be left intact, unless you feel like disassembling it. I did, but it really isn't necessary. Be mindful as there are some springs under tension in there that would love to get lost in some dark recess of your work room.
Not all tears are an evil.
That, my friends, is why I keep coming back. It is because the world is not as bad as we are led to believe. There are good people doing good things. They say that the youth of today are the leaders of tomorrow. The young men and women and the Illinois Teen Institute prove that wrong. The youth of today are the leaders of today. I am blessed to work with them and I know that I am a better person because of it.
The door to the right which you cannot see goes to the 2nd floor bathroom- again ladies a no show. It has peachy pink plastic tile floor to ceiling with black tile trim- It is a wonderful big bathroom and may show it someday as it will be staying like it is for awhile- I pulled in some black and white toile and it does have a dated cuteness but we recently finished rewiring and alot of the tiles that had to come down need to be reglued.
I have been meaning to post this for over a week now. Life never pauses I suppose. Now there is a thought - if Life ever pauses, you don't need to worry, its all done.
I have started this blog a few times but don't know exactly how to write all of this so I am just going to go with a whole lotta random!
After decades of the state defining resistance to create ineffectual protest, US protest movements have succumbed to a kind of Stockholm syndrome where the needs of the oppressor are placed above the desires of the oppressed. It’s a form of self-induced censorship. What we need to do is to step outside of these state sanctioned rules of engagement that bankrupt current protest movement tactics, while giving the state a blank check to run rough shod over any resistance it finds. US resistance movements need to redefine what it means to effective and need to redefine the tactics it’ll use to achieve those goals in a way that works for them, instead of letting the enemy completely dictate the terms of battle.
What is it about the French farmhouse that is so seductive?
According to the Welsh Refugee Council: “Our children's advocacy officer visited him in Cardiff Bay police station and he was distraught beyond description. He had been put in padded clothing for fear of self-harm.”
The April 2010 Daring Bakers’ challenge was hosted by Esther of The Lilac Kitchen. She challenged everyone to make a traditional British pudding using, if possible, a very traditional British ingredient: suet.
But who cares, she’s my dog and I love her to death. Between all the whining for attention and the mischievous behavior I can’t help but not give a damn about all of it because she fills me with so much more happiness than there was before. I’ll discipline her later:)
Scallops with Bacon, Baby Spinach with Warm Coffee and Balsamic Glaze
MW August 2011
But the show’s popularity, especially here in Saudi Arabia, has not gone unnoticed by the religious clerics, who have given it a thumbs down and issued a fatwa (a religious opinion on Islamic law) saying that it is sinful to watch the show. They fear that the show will corrupt its society, cause moral decay and encourage dating and pre-marital sex.
Quote: Whether you think you can or think you can’t, you’re right. ~ Henry Ford
I started out with a light sky blue paint as a base. Then I sprayed olive Glitter Mist over a doily. I stamped with Stazon and distressed with Ranger distress ink. I used stamps, rubons, and paint to add texture and color.
We had a lovely day and went to the Egg Theatre in Bath to see the Nutcracker.
50 copies Red/Blue/White cake LP
There are two methods you can use to bend spoons. (They both work just as well on forks, keys, and a variety of other objects, usually small and metallic. Spoons are traditional.)
But he won't want to talk.
The love of awakened motherhood is
I do find it helps to set out the . . . rules, is the word I’m going to go for . . . the rules that say what is normal for your character. The Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders is a widely used manual for diagnosing mental disorders. It’s the book that tells you what you need to do to say you’re OCD. What I did with my character was look at what I’d had her do and think up until this point and see what was a good fit for her. So I had her take a few tests including the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator assessment and I very quickly realised that this list fitted her like a glove:
This was a birthday present and I love it. I also bought the grey cushion covers as I didn't want it all matchy-matchy and the charcoal round cushion.
Okay. Before you freak out, yes, I AM a dork like that. Nothing fascinates me quite like human behavior. Nothing. And no, it wasn’t really that structured, just reflective.
I read most of the related content with interest and I will be working on a Blog schedule.
People change, even after marriage. Keep an open mind, but never settle.
With only two episodes so far, what do I like about The Client List?
She released the single Get You Drunk on 2011 and has rapidly grow in less than 1 year. She first began by working for mega hit producer Scott Storch under the company Tuff Jew Productions. She was signed to his label as the face for his company. Due to Scott’s famous addiction to drugs and economic problems, Sindy was offered other deals in the entertainment world, including a role in a future horror flick. It was then when she decided to take the role and pursue her music career as an independent artist.
This is an economical platform which is accompanied by a number of other measures (see political program page)
Stage three: After the fish is done (it will flake easily), take it out and gently put on plates – it will want to fall apart if it’s done, which can ruin the look a bit! Then take out the vegetables, put the spinach in the pan on top of the mushrooms and sweet potatoes, and give them a stir around so that the spinach wilts slightly. Distribute onto plates, and serve.
And just maybe you will end up with a nice guy who doesn’t spit.
You could buy your own truffle omelette kit - 6 eggs stored overnight with a small truffle (the eggs absorb the truffle flavour) which is then grated over the omelette:
This past Friday I visited Limestone Branch, a new micro-distillery in Lebanon, Kentucky. Its proprietors are brothers Steve and Paul Beam, who are descended from both the Beams (Minor Case Beam via Guy Beam) and the Dants (Joseph Washington Dant via William Washington Dant).
I can hear the hum of my small refrigerator in my room. Funny, I put that fridge in during the second week of school and I've never noticed that hum.
bonds of friendship forged with…
Adirondack colour wash - Stream
Ties are broken by the number of enemy general's elements killed.
Look’d up in perfect silence at the stars.
Wilson JG. Environment and birth defects. New York: Academic Press, 1973.
17. Comfortably Numb (8:16)
Something about a good flight makes everything else in life better. That's probably yet another sign that I'm hopelessly addicted to this sport, but I'm a happy addict so it's fine by me.
dancing party-hearty on the floor;
The back of GTAIII's case labels Liberty City as "The worst place in America." Truer words have never been written. Right at the start of the game Claude, my nameless, silent in-gamer persona is betrayed by his partner Catalina and left for dead. The only person he can trust is a guy named 8-Ball whom you escape prison with. Adding to the depressing atmosphere was the rain and the song that happened to be playing on Head Radio when I stole a car, Fade Away, which would end up becoming one of my favorite songs in the game. While behind the wheel of the car I jacked, I made many mistakes. I ended up failing the simple task of driving to a destination on the map several times because I wasn't used to the driving controls. After a short while, I was successful in getting 8-Ball to his desired location and was free to take on missions or explore the first island of Liberty City.
"Honey, you're getting really big. It's getting hard for both of us to fit into the rocking chair. Do you think that it's time to stop rocking to sleep every night?"
3. Add the eggs one by one, whisking in each one before adding the next. Then whisk in the vanilla.
1. Fat Albert and the Cosby Kids: (First aired 1972, ran until 1985) "Hey hey hey! It's Faaatttt Albert!" This was the beloved expression of the characters on Fat Albert--an animated series that was created, produced, and at times voiced by comedian Bill Cosby. The show was based on remembrances of Cosby's childhood gang and focused on the lovable and oversized character Albert. Often featuring an educational lesson and a rock song performed by the characters, Cosby's upbeat kids had an impact on children across America, regardless of race. In 2004, the animated series was released as a film adaptation, but of course nothing tops the original.
King does know who Michael’s father is, and he isn’t his father. And all we need is another Harvard lawyer. So his tag team partner is loaded with personality.
This is SO stinkin' hard!
What must we be free of to receive Holy Communion? (We must be free from mortal sin.)
“As the mother of a three-year-old boy who has spent the past 18 months fighting against leukaemia, I find the above billboard offensive and upsetting,” the complainant, identified only as Jody Condin, wrote.
The smile on my face doesn’t mean my life is perfect. It means I appreciate what I have and what God has blessed me with.
Your behavior last night was abhorrent. You hit a few too many Cosmopolitans there eh girl? How many times have I told you you can’t hold your liquor like you used to. Those days are gone Bitsy. Your rambling diatribes about the “state of things” nowadays was not only misinformed and naïve, but a bunch of gobblygook. You embarrassed yourself completely.
The handsomest man in the Russian court, tall and formed like a Greek god, a model in fashion and deportment which all of us strive to follow. His eyes are like the blue sky, his hair the color of ebony. He is stronger than a team of oxen and sleepless because of his desire to receive you in his arms. And he can also read and write!
“Now when you woke up this morning,” he began, conversational in his tone, completely ignoring the legitimately upset champion and even more disturbed referee (and this is saying nothing about the commentators who were as confused as a beaver in a teacup), “did you go to the mirror like I said? Did you say screw you? Screw your hopes? Screw your dreams? Screw all the good you thought this life was gonna bring you? If you didn’t, do it now. Now if you’ll excuse me, I’m gonna get this match on and try to make you bitches happy.”
p.s. have had my new iphone 4s for less than 24 hours and am already completely obsessed with the siri feature!!! nothing like telling your phone that you are hungry... and instantly getting a list of the closest restaurants to your current location. loads o fun.
That’s as maybe, but my instinct tells me they’re wrong. There remain three very big unanswered questions in this case: first, the yarn about Strauss-Kahn ‘fleeing justice in a hurry’ appears to be complete bollocks; second, the maid was in the suite cleaning the room of a guy she knew was about to check out – why? Nobody does that; and above all else – as Ben Brafman publicly hinted last week – there are some irregularities surrounding Diallo. Why was she given political asylum? Why was she living in an apartment reserved for HIV positive women? Was her husband shot dead by New York cops…and if so, why?
Seriously though; what is going to happen to America when the product of their educational system is so confused by what they’ve been taught that they are as good as useless? When they can no longer distinguish between real facts and bullshit propaganda?
Most recently, Cyrus McGoldrick, civil rights director for CAIR's New York chapter, told a newspaper that a spate of arson attacks by a lone suspect on mosques was driven by bigotry even though police say personal vendettas were in play. In one case, a mosque had refused to let the suspect use its restroom.
A great alternative to granola bar in the summer when those seem to melt if I leave them in my car.
Another Nail In My Heart
Hers must have been rough
The Best Offense (20) – Countered enemy attacks 20 times using Shield
So what should we look at, according to Meranus?
Thank you to everyone who submitted for the podcast! I'm not going to spend long here because I've been doing so well keeping this whole podcast resolution thing I don't want to linger too long before posting it. If your story was not included in the podcast it wasn't because it wasn't good. At times I doubted my concept and fundamental belief that good fiction can happen quickly. Not one submission was anything less than good. I chose the ones I chose because they worked well together and worked well with the theme. Thanks once more to everyone for submitting. There is absolutely no restriction on people submitting again whether you've been "published" previously on the podcast or not. This is an amazing group of talented people and I can't wait to read more!
The first time I ever heard a tornado siren I was in my mid twenties, working a water leak late one night for the city I was currently employed at. A storm was rolling in and I was trying to work as fast as possible. That is when the sirens went off. Like I said, I have never heard them before and did not know what that loud high pitched sound was but I knew I was in danger. I remember panic set in because the sound was so deafening and I did not know what to do. All I wanted to do was get away from it. I remember trying to just run but then thinking I had my truck there so I ran back to it. I didn't know where to drive, I actually drove in circles not knowing where to go. The sound was so loud is completely screwed up all rational thought. It was only until the next day I knew what the sound meant.
Even if the sausage making was a fiasco.
1) Worked from 155 to 215 (f @ 2nd rep twice at 215)
We can't buy more time 'cause time won't accept our money
Added Corso, “It is true enlightenment.”
I can feel love grow inside of me and it is exciting.
LOL and most of all I still love the fact that people still tell me that I look way younger than my actual age. Haha! I’m not trying to brag or anything but I guess that’s something I should be thankful as well. And speaking of that, yes! It’s also important to stay healthy as well. Sometimes people tell me what’s the point of staying healthy when we’ll all hit the bucket eventually… well that’s the point! We should make the best out of ourselves. How can we do what God has set out for us to do if we’re negligent of ourselves.
If you hold God in disdain, you will be in trouble, if the president in the making has his way: “We need to teach our people to fear God ... How do you teach society to fear God? Is it not by making children pray before school as it was in the past?”
There is an unending list of what we have lost and what we have gained.
Recognize his voice…. I recognize the voice of my good friends. When they call, they don’t have to tell me who they are – I recognize their voice. That’s because I’ve spent time listening to them, hearing their voice.
I don't think I have mentioned it on this blog before, but Ross and I are in the very early stages of the home buying process. We rent our townhouse right now and we are ready for a single-family home to call our own. Sounds easy enough, right? Save money, pick a house, buy it. Not even close! We are in the earliest stages of home buying and I already feel like I'm going to have an anxiety attack. Home buying is NOT the same in real life as it is on House Hunters.
People with food get fat and foolish
Guidelines are meant to give recommendations based on the best available evidence. Guidelines should not be a set of rules, set in stone. Ideally, guidelines have gathered evidence in a transparent way and make it easier for the clinicians to grasp the evidence for a certain procedure in a certain situation … and to see the gaps.
Vicky wins the Heavenly pack.
Crack the eggs in a large bowl and add the sugar, molasses, corn syrup and oil. Beat them until light and fluffy. Add the vanilla extract and the grated carrots and stir until combined. You don't have to worry about over mixing at this stage so go nuts! Once your wet mixture is ready, add your flour mixture and stir in slowly until just combined. If you over mix at this stage, you'll end up with a really tough cupcake...its like eating rubber. I have to admit, I've done it not too long ago with banana muffins. Its been a while since I've made muffins so I completely forgot about the rule of over mixing. I was so disappointed in myself that I had to make it again for the sake of redemption.
to balance you.
230 gram cream cheese
Does anyone see the pain she feels?
bearing five others, by an exaggerated, excessive man
What am I?
Fourth, softball is a little over a month away
3. Philip squared – Genesis ” That’s All”
First of all let me just start by telling you how adorable Suzy Ultman's fabrics, papers, softies and illustrations are! Her work is very popular in the paper and craft industry. In fact you may have seen it without even realizing it. Her creations have been published by Chronicle Books and her list of clients rang from Crate & Barrel to Oopsy Daisy and many more.
1. I have posted before about my love of gallery walls. The main reason I specifically love ours is because it's filled with so much love and so many great memories. Everytime I walk by it on my way in/out of the Chouse... it def makes me smile.
enough to cistern this dry bourne we bone.
I have met this beast many times before.
On Wednesday night, Mr Choo visited 12 families in Florida condominium. One of the resident Madam Lim was so impressed by Mr Choo and she signed up as a volunteer to assist him during his ‘tea-party’ sessions:
the kiss that would turn my lips to a work of art.
Perhaps senior executives in business are just not hearing enough about this trend from their sustainability teams.
Never Nosh a Matzo Ball by Sharon Kahn
― Italo Calvino, Why Read the Classics?
We did visit both the school and the big boat ( witch mostly will be his classroom:)) and i think this is perfect for him. There will be so many new adventures and so many new possibilities for him.
But she also added: "Every incident and description is so embellished with similes and dependent clauses that the narrative is left hanging about like a disconsolate bloke in Miss Selfridge, abandoned outside the fitting rooms while the style lingers to admire itself in the mirror."
Though I find it difficult, there is a silver lining in the clouds.
